I tweaked it a bit for my kids. I baked cupcakes and bought them a card, which I cut down the middle, envelope and all, and we sang half of the birthday song: “Hap birth da t yo” or “Happy Birthday to you, Happy Birthday to you” and then we would stop singing.
Trish wants to see what I'll do with it. I'm thinking appliqué, but then, just now, I thought: what about hand-stitched reverse appliqué, a la Alabama Chanin, only in silk instead of jersey? I don't know--I think raw edges would help bring it down a notch or two--I don't like things that are too precious, too frou-frou, too perfect. They may look lovely, but you know you're not going to wear them. Oh, well, you might if you had That Kind of Life--the opera, Dinners Out, stuff like that. For me, clothing that's too precious is just going to hang in the closet until I give it away. So I'm thinking about this one.
At the same time that I am graduating, Tanya is also completing her doula training. Now perhaps you are asking, “What is a doula?” Well think of a woman in labor and think of a midwife. The midwife delivers the baby. The doula is the other person in the room providing continual labor support for the birthing mother and her partner. In the process of Tanya learning about this, I’ve gotten to learn a ton about pregnancy and childbirth. I’ve also been delighted to watch my wife grow as a person. She is more excited now than I’ve seen her in a while and I’m excited about where her journey may take her.
You have been counting the days until you turned double digits.
This year, I really need that early start. My plants are getting tall and leggy. They were hitting the grow lights, so I had to move them upstairs into the front window. I'll be ready to start hardening off later this week, when the temps hit the 70s.
I like this one if it is of any use for anybody else.
If you'd like to buy the book (and who wouldn't?), it's in bookstores nationwide and on all the usual websites including Amazon.
Marinate the chicken with grated Onion, Ginger-Garlic paste, 1 tbs red Chilli powder, 2 tbs Vinegar, 2 tbs Soya sauce and Salt. Leave it for about an hour. Then heat 2 tbs of oil in a frying pan. Add chopped Onion and Capsicum. Fry it on low flame till they are soft. Remove them from fire. Now heat rest of the oil in the same pan. Wait for few seconds. Add the marinated chicken to the oil. Add the turmeric powder, chilli powder, chopped Tomato and salt to taste. Cook it on medium flame for 10 minutes. Add the fried Onion and fried Capsicum to it. Mix well and cook it till the chicken turns soft. Add the butter and mix well. Chilli Chicken is ready to be served with Hakka Noodles.
UNTIL. THIS. YEAR.
#1 In 2010, not only does the United States have a central bank, but it also runs our economy and issues all of our currency. The Federal Reserve has devalued the U.S. dollar by over 95 percent since 1913 and it has been used to create the biggest mountain of government debt in the history of the world.
18. TWILIGHT (1998)
The current little caboose continues to make me laugh, and brings so much joy to our family. I can't imagine, nor remember life without her.
Brian Lumley -The Disapproval of Jeremy Cleave
Yet other memories, when we step back into them, we find ourselves right back there, fitting snugly back into our younger skin, our smaller, more agile bones, with perhaps a more inquisitive or sharper mind, living that so-called past it as if it was the here and now, living a life with more time yet to come than time that has passed by.
How to Carve a Chicken
on a mental level, it is intellect and power; on a spiritual level (the highest level),
Some people spend their whole lives looking for the right partner. Nate Schaper found his in high school. In the eight months since their cautious flirting became a real, honest, tell-the-parents relationship, Nate and Adam have been inseparable. Even when local kids take their homophobia to brutal levels, Nate is undaunted. He and Adam are rock solid. Two parts of a whole. Yin and yang.
had a rough time of it at the end. (Um...pun not intended there.)
Not a care in the world
Response
This spellbinding debut, reminiscent of Memoirs of a Geisha, depicts—with chilling accuracy—life behind North Korea’s iron curtain. But for Gi and Il-sun, forced into the underworld of human trafficking, their captivity outside North Korea is far crueler than the tight control of their “Dear Leader.” Tenderhearted Gi, just on the verge of womanhood, is consigned to a fate that threatens not only her body but her mind. How she and Il-sun endure, how they find a path to healing, is what drives this absorbing and exquisite novel—from an exciting young Algonquin discovery—to its perfectly imagined conclusion.Visit Brandon W. Jones's website.
Chapter 14 – Nick
If Taib and his team in BN are voted out, Najib’s own days in the federal capital will be numbered.
they wanted the church to be controlled by laymen. Nicholas, the
3- The U.S. cannot afford the Medicare and Social Security benefits that have been promised to future retirees.
Of moths.
Brutus, my darling cat, is somewhat of a jerk. Him and Chino were eating from the food bowl and they both didn’t want to share. They were pushing against each other with their heads and it was really quite funny. Well, Brutus takes a piece of food and tosses it to the side with his mouth. I’m not kidding, I caught it on video. Chino got distracted by the piece of food hitting the floor and then Brutus wins the entire bowl while Chino has to wait. It was smart, but he is a monster and I now understand why they fight all of the time. Cats are just like humans.
We have soldiers whose job it is to drive a humvee back and forth on a road escorting trucks carrying ice cream, fruit juice and Haliburton et al profits, from Kuwait to Baghdad/Falujah/Al Hillah/Basrah etc.
I know it's Kinston.
Brooklyn experiments is back with a brunch experiment ! Visit the Bell House this Sunday from noo to 4pm and check out people’s most creative and delicious interpretations. Tickets are $20.00 in advance, and allow you to taste away. Competitors are out for two Jet Blue tickets anywhere.
Rabbi Eric Yoffie — for whom I have tremendous respect and admiration — recently wrote an unfortunate blog titled “Religious But Not Spiritual.” In it he wrote,
9) One direction – What makes you beautiful
We let them sit outside for a few weeks, not really knowing where they would find a place in our home.
Admission– £8.14
9 Tbsp raw honey
I think that’s it for now…how are you doing?
This is one of the songs from the film. Aimee Mann is amazing. This somg is so haunting and beautiful: Perfect for the film.
Other: cuttlebug embossing folder, vintage corner die, ODBD die to match stamp
When planning your garden, remember that your color choices can influence your mood and even impact your health. The invisible vibrations of color produce different emotional responses in us – some are stimulating, others relaxing. Here’s a list of our typical reactions to common hues. You can decide what’s best for you, but color therapists suggest that it’s important to include a balance of colors in the garden; if you focus on one particular color, include a smaller amount of its complement as well.
I think I understood the concept of seasonal burnout a little before I came to the mountains, but only a little. That moment where winter was giving its death-rattle, but spring was only about half-sprung. There may have been angst for the new season to truly unfold, but it was on a far different level. I may have somewhat felt it before, but I never truly realized what a cruel time April was until I came up the hill.
it just might eat me before it eats you.
If you haven't seen it yet I strongly encourage you to do so. Makes you want to be a strong mom, throw out your tv and send your kids to the library. Makes your kids want to read *and* pray!
Kim Carnes Bette Davis’ eyes US
Est. FG: 1.013 SG
He said: “I regret what happened because Cheryl was a close friend. I’ve always believed we’ll end up doing something together again.”
B. We parted ways last Summer...and not under wonderful circumstances.
Closed-aperture gap is only what the camera knows when light fears the velocity of light
Who they might see
And he gives it to her and tells her to open it when she gets home. He wants to imagine her face when she sees it.
hot sweaty sex. Racist? Or
This Thursday, June 23rd, Quaker’s Mobile Recording Studio will set up shop at Northbrook Court in Northbrook, IL from 10am – 4pm. Kids who come out to the fancy studio-on-wheels will get an opportunity to record one of four songs (“Just The Way You Are” by Bruno Mars , “Breathe” by Michelle Branch , “Nothin’ on You” by B.o.B , “Wildflower” by The JaneDear Girls) in the mobile recording studio. Families will be able to enjoy other fun perks as well, like samples of the superstar of snacks. And even though Nick won’t be on hand to personally greet you, kids can get their picture taken on the red carpet where Nick will be super-imposed in the shot. It’s the next best thing to standing there with him! My daughter can’t wait to have her picture taken “with” Nick Jonas.
my LILY.
"Aw, do we have to?"
The primary campaign certainly made it clear that Governor Romney and I have some differences. But there are many significant areas in which we agree: the need for lower taxes, smaller government, and a reduction in out-of-control spending. We certainly agree that abortion is wrong and marriage should be between one man and one woman. I am also comfortable with Governor Romney on foreign policy matters, and we share the belief that we can never allow Iran to possess nuclear weapons. And while I had concerns about Governor Romney making a case as a candidate about fighting against Obamacare, I have no doubt if elected he will work with a Republican Congress to repeal it and replace it with a bottom up, patient, not government, driven system.
Weight Watcher's is an amazing program,
The buck was magnificent in his winter coat; perfectly camouflaged with shades of gray and black and brown. His antlers spread out wide and tall from his head, at least twelve tines spearing the air above him.
There are state and federal curriculum requirements; there are only so many teachers and hours in the day; there are a variety of student abilities and learning styles to attempt to account for. Any system that attempts to offer the same, or even similar solutions for all of this complexity is already behind the 8-ball.
So, I’m already plotting our next trip back and came across this cool tip from the Met’s website. It’s rooted in one of my all-time fav books as a kid: ”Read From the Mixed up Files of Mrs. Basil E. Frankweiler, by E.L. Konigsburg, before your visit and ask the kids where they would hide if they wanted to stay in the museum overnight. Then, take advantage of the proximity of Central Park to take a little time out from art with some playtime in the Ancient Playground next door.” I’m determined to get back to continue our journey. I’ll keep you posted on the next adventure.
In one of the chapters, Sarai discusses how we plan both what we wear and what we decide to make for ourselves. She suggests an exercise of picking out five things that you love to wear and why - which in turn, may give you clues on how to build a wardrobe around the qualities that are important to you. I found both Tasia's and Karen's choices really interesting, but I was also very intrigued to read comments from their readers. It's amazing how much of your personality and essence readers can glean from your blog: how you dress and how you write and what it says about you. So, completely jumping on the bandwagon, here are my five choices.
It might look like a motivational message to inspire MPs wandering the corridors of power – but to others it makes Number 10 look like a nightclub.
I read off my address, then proceeded to tell me tale of woe, how I had closed the account and didn’t care about the lousy $2.69 and didn’t want to get any more paper statements because of the 25-cent service charge and — oh, yeah — I cared about the environment too.
3. The Teardrop Explodes - When I Dream
What do you guys think of the cover change and which set do you prefer? Insurgent is out in the UK on the 1st May of this year and I for one can’t wait!
I hope it does. ^_^ I was able to finish this bracelet pretty quickly. But I made it too big! GRRR..
Stir in turkey mixture and cook, breaking up any large pieces with a wooden spoon, until no longer pink, about 3 minutes. Stir in tomato sauce, scraping up any browned bits; transfer to slow cooker.
To make the pancake, combine the flour, baking powder and salt in a large bowl. In a smaller separate bowl, whisk together the soymilk, Ener-G and cider vinegar and let it sit for about 5 minutes to slightly thicken. Then slowly add the liquid into the flour mixture and mix gently until combined. Do not overmix. Add in the vegetables and gently combine again with the batter. Set aside.
While the S-curve corset looks incredibly uncomfortable and I thank the Gods that I live in the age of cotton knit I have always loved the fashions of the Gibson Girl/ Edwardian era. 1910 of course is towards the end of this time and with the beginning of WW1 more realistic, comfortable styles took hold.
It’s true that communities can help brands become commercial powerhouses and money-making machines. But it takes investments of time and money. It must be a steady, strategic, nose-to-the-grindstone approach that rarely happens overnight.
So there's the recent progress... We're getting there, and so is the final baby countdown. As of today, I'm now 35w1d... time is closing in on us :)
03. In Jeopardy
Mrs. P’s ‘Be-A-Famous-Writer’ Contest Starts September 1st: Did you ever read a story and think, “I could do that!” Well, now’s your chance to prove it. Enter Mrs. P’s “Be-A-Famous-Writer” Contest. Write a story, submit it to MrsP.com – and Mrs. P herself might read your story on her website! (Judges include Dave Barry, Craig Ferguson, Diana Leszczynski, and Andre Bormanis) Learn more by watching Melissa from the ConsumerQueen.com interview Mrs. P. this Thursday on MomTV.
Second one: if I wasn’t conditioned I couldn’t be controlled. I would ask a lot of uncomfortable questions – questioning authority, the very way I live and the world I live in. I wouldn’t buy things that are in the ads, I wouldn’t occupy my mind chasing money or fame or women, I wouldn’t be a slave to meaningless impulses. I wouldn’t be a sheep that everyone wants to. People don’t want rebels – they’re uncomfortable to live with.
I also had a revelation earlier in the year when I attended a show and lecture by Tom Lundberg, an embroiderer who works really small. After I came home from his show I was inspired to "draw" a flip-flop sandal as my daily production, since flip-flops are a favorite motif of his.
And Kirsten Powers responded:
as if they had sidestepped the flame of death.
No one complains that it is “mean and divisive” if their doctor diagonoses them with cancer. Because a challenging diagnosis is not the doctor’s personal opinion – it’s true objectively. You need to make your presentation of the gospel exactly like a doctor’s diagnosis. Am I making sense here?If you are telling them the truth and you can show them publicly testable reasons and evidence, what sense does it make for them to be offended? They might as well be offended by their credit card statement or their speeding ticket. And that’s why people in the New Testament were constantly appealing to evidence whenever they talked to people about why they ought to become Christians.
Blogs hops are a great way to meet other bloggers, socialize and gain more followers. Do you like to socialize? Well, we all like followers, right?!
This is not to say that neuroscience has no uses in explaining music and the value we attach to it. On the contrary, the link between the way we experience musical structure and the way our ears were originally conditioned to monitor our environment for danger and desire should certainly have an important role to play in our understanding of how and why the musical practices we now encounter (in the form of sound waves, radio waves and hexadecimal numerical systems) originally evolved.
GNC Lean Shake is complete with well-balanced ratios of high quality protein, vitamins, minerals and fat. Proven effective for weight loss, Lean Shake can also help reduce cholesterol and support lean muscle mass and a healthy metabolism. When used in conjunction with the provided meal and exercise plan, this delicious oat-based shake can help you achieve and maintain your weight loss goals. It features a patented fiber-rich blend that increases your feeling of fullness and satiety so you eat less and wait longer between meals. This combination of functionally-specific fibers includes oat beta-glucan. Oat beta-glucan is a naturally occurring and powerful soluble fiber found in oat bran; it is known as a low-glycemic fiber that supports normal, healthy blood glucose levels. Oat bran and fiber have slower and more sustained effect on blood sugar and energy levels than when consuming high-glycemic carbohydrates food such as pastries, breads or pasta.
I’m not here to judge people who have done IVF. I’m really not. But I am trying to show another perspective, one that is often overlooked. I know infertility is a touchy, difficult subject. Yet, I feel qualified to speak on it since we (Ross and I together, not me alone) are, according to the doc, infertile. But what does that even mean? It's such a yucky science-y word. I think it means that the Lord saw fit to close my womb. The Bible is clear that the Lord is in charge of the womb and yet I also know that infertility is a result of the fall. So why? Why would he do that? Or why would He allow it? He allowed it in our family so we could be freed up to go on a holy mission from God to adopt just one or two or three or six little lives out of that vast, vast sea of need.
Cape Poge Wildlife Refuge, better known to us as East Beach, stretches for seven golden, sandy miles from Wasque Point on the south to the Cape Pogue Lighthouse up north. When I first visited Martha’s Vineyard in April 2005, Lulu and I would bike out to the Dike Bridge (yeah, that one), tiptoe across the wooden beams, and cavort on the beach that was completely deserted and pristine.
But, I didn't.
Having said that, I now have to admit that I am terrible at these kind of things! And yes, I always broke the chain letters too!
-high knee for another Miz 2.
Attorney Laura Miller, Equip for Equality
The original recipe calls for blueberries, but any dark berry rich in antioxidants will do. We tend to use whatever frozen berries are on sale, and for this batch we used blackberries. I also like to simmer the syrup with cinnamon, both for its taste and its health benefits.
This little creature I found when John and I were going for a swim and I went to get our towels that were hanging up in the bathroom. At first I thought it was a spider but upon closer inspection it turned out to be a scorpion.
Performance dressage is about flash, it's about illusion, it's about taking a horse that is bred to near perfection in terms of "three good gaits," conformation being uphill to give the illusion of a raised forehand, and a shoulder that has so much movement that even when it is being inhibited with behind the vertical riding, it still looks impressive.
Are you ready to hop on over to the next blog? The easiest way to do so is to click on the name right below mine, so that would be Mandy and then from her blog hop on over to Julie's blog and so on until you have hopped a full circle back to here!
My felwow Amewicans and Wepubwicans, I'm sure you were disgusted that evewy station was showing those Democwats twying to pick the wight man to wun against my bwother Jeb as the next Pwesident.
So I am quietly freaking out to the sound of the ginormous de-humidifiers the restoration guys installed on both levels of my house (the knitting room got its very own) while we await the insurance company's decision.
The pact is key to the U.S. exit strategy in Afghanistan because it establishes guidelines for any American forces who remain after the withdrawal deadline and for financial help to the impoverished country and its security forces.
15. 18 Ferncliff Rd… Asked $1,995,000. Sold $1,550,000. Started: 6/2008
I took bits and pieces from several tutorials I found online and Frankenstein'd my own method of doing it.
A few things that I noticed and questioned.There were some innuendos made that Heathcliff was dark, that he might of been black. I believe Isabella said something of that he was black. But he is portrayed as white in movies.
The princess reached out to touch her sister’s cheek, her heart aching when her fingers could not feel the warmth of her skin.
I think what happened here is that as part of the Dodd-Frank bill (you know, the one that solves all our financial problems) the ability to trade gold on the Forex market was “eliminated.” I’m guessing that has to do with the leverage, so it appears that my broker still allows trading of the metal, but it’s essentially at full value. Without having done additional research, I’m surmising that this gets around Dodd-Frank, but also pretty much means that it removes a lot of the incentive to trade Gold.
01 Running Across Thin Ice With Tigers
(Sorry I didn't get a picture)
9) Practical proposals for increasing employment in the United States now and critiques/discussions of the current Summers/Geithner effort to achieve sustained economic growth in the United States with a massive financial sector bail-out and a temporary and limited fiscal stimulus for the broader economy.
We went with a creamy white because this room needed some light!!!
Stay tuned for part two of Ministry to Men: Some Reflections.
Congratulate yourself on planning a visit to view a Little Italy condo – you won’t regret your decision to consider Little Italy as your new home.
I never wanted you to break down
In addition to Justice’s dynamic mixing skills, the visual aspect of this show was innovative and dazzlingly produced. The Marshall stacks turned out to be vessels for eye-popping animated LED light configurations, and the stage was hung with curtains of evenly spaced ping-pong ball sized lights that hosted endless patterns of snaking light formations. Occasionally, the normal stage lights would go on behind this curtain, and surprising new depth would be given to the room. It looked like whoever designed this light setup had an absolute blast figuring out how to morph the atmosphere in the room during different songs, and it’s always great to see a show where it’s apparent that very creative people were involved in its production.
Ep 2.
Anyone with any information is urged to call 0845 113 5000.
It requires one on high to save one from the depths of sin.
It was great to go back to Pilates yesterday! I missed last weeks class, so I was really excited to get back there. It was a great class…we worked on isolating the abs and tried some new and tricky moves. One of my favorites was a version of rolling like a ball. Rolling like a ball is a fun exercise that allows you to use momentum as well as your abs. It is also not as easy as it looks! (If you try this…be sure not to roll onto your neck!) Yesterday in class, we did a version where we took the momentum out of the exercise, and didn’t roll as far back. It was really hard because getting back up was all in the abdominals and you had to try and do it with a fluid movement. I am a little sore today, and I am not usually sore after Pilates classes!
Don't know what it is? Well, it is not scary, but a little more challenging than our other assignments, maybe that's why we haven't done it yet! Here is Wikipedia's definition:
Are the Council of Canadians transparently trying to overturn certified election results that turned out to be the result only after demonstrable illegal actions in those ridings? Yes. Should they like the fraudulently tainted election result? No! Why do Fred DeLorey, and the Conservatives like, and defend, the fraudulent results when they are in possession of stolen seats? Honest people want to know the results of clean elections, even if it means a little self sacrifice.
I was challenged by an older and much wiser mom recently to institute regular family nights into our routine. It's not a new idea, rather one we've always liked the idea of, but never put into regular practice.
The breaststroke is a swimming style in which the swimmer is on his or her chest and the torso does not rotate. It is the most popular recreational style due to its stability and the ability to keep the head out of the water a large portion of the time. In most swimming classes, beginners learn either the breaststroke or the front crawl first. Since the breaststroke can be swum with the eyes almost always above water, it is important in lifesaving, as it allows the rescuer to approach the victim without losing sight of them. However, in competitive swimming, the breaststroke is regarded as one of the most difficult strokes, requiring comparable endurance and leg strength to other strokes. The stroke itself is the slowest of any competitive strokes and thought to be the oldest of all swimming strokes.
Doan Van Vuon, a college-educated agricultural engineer, spent 18 years and his life’s savings turning 99 acres of coastal swampland near Haiphong into a viable aquaculture farm. His daughter and nephew drowned in the process, but he pushed on and eventually built dykes capable of protecting the coastline from tropical storms. In Vietnam all land belongs to the state, but sweeping economic reforms in the 1980s led to conditional 20-year land grants to many farmers. In this case, state-run media have alleged that the family was cheated in 1993 when they were given a lease of only 14 years instead of what should have been 20 years.
That means the Kansas farmers could switch some acres to soybeans, which is why the report is an estimate.
Events such as December’s Christkindlmarket, based on the annual authentic German Christmas celebration, turn Arlington into a winter wonderland full of holiday cheer and Christmas magic straight from the streets of Nuremburg. Christmas lights, food, and a jolly good time leave with each and every visitor.
While we as professionals must know where the lines are drawn and play within those lines to ensure ethical practices, we are also to encourage candidates to guard the privacy of others…specifically references. A common practice on resumes of both permanent and temporary candidates is providing a list of candidates at the end of the resume. In some cases this may violate the privacy and protection of the reference, especially if the resume is submitted through a public job board, forum or even unsecure email. The resume enters a public domain and privacy maybe come an issue.
Twisting around, Helena tried to cushion the fall that would afford the least amount of injury, but she didn’t see the small crevasse rise up in front of her or the sharp protruding rocks nestled comfortably in them.
Definitely still our little peanut but he has grown so much- he is finally starting to fit into newborn clothes! We are getting lots of little smiles and he's working on his neck control which right now is more like an out of control bobble head!
Photography: Alfred & Emma Salom (absolutely wonderful to work with and amazing pictures!)
The court also ordered retrial in the case of 20 other people who were arrested with Al Khawaja last year during the unrest which allegedly had links with foreign terrorist organization. The defendants include Shia cleric Hassan Mushaima and Ebrahim Sharif, secretary-general of the National Democratic Action Society, a leftist group.
The man had given her blood, and then he had cut her. She needed to taste her blood before the Venator stopped her. She was about to lick her palm when the door beside her opened and he pulled her out of the car.
2 p NEEDS Fit by SESSIONS FIT
Why does America give a fuck about Dick Clark dying? What did he contribute to our society besides spawning the grotesquely overpaid Ryan Seacrest?
Greek food is becoming increasingly popular in Bergen County as appetites and dietary preferences are leaning towards Mediterranan foods. One of the best Greek restaurants in Bergen County is Greek Taverna, which opened in the City Place shopping center in Edgewater in 2006. I recently had a chance to re-visit the restaurant after about a 3-year hiatus and the food is better than ever. I’ve updated the post with a number of new pictures I think you’ll enjoy.
Ralph Fiennes/Kristin Scott Thomas (The English Patient)
Jack was tortured, poor fellow. What with Carrie carrying on with his brother Vinnie for the six months before Jack finally took his own life.
Standards… that are the very least amount that is acceptable…and still retain your job?
Nice weather begins to emerge in the Destin area, and for the first time, we take both boys, now walking, to the beach! We no longer have a baby and a little boy but instead are starting to see the "twin" part of "Irish" emerging.
If a student can assess all of this information about herself and answer some of those questions before beginning the college search process, she can begin to figure out which programs will be the right fit – whether NCAA or IHSA. There really is a program out there to fit every student’s needs – and if a student needs help wading through all of the schools out there, be sure to contact me. I’m happy to help.
The REBEL on the Move.
Of course I bought neither. I'm not one to buy things for myself right before Christmas (unlike my husband!). And I couldn't pay $30 for a candle...I'm way too cheap! I love scented candles, but they never have enough scent (probably because I'm too cheap to buy good ones).
Me #2: No, not really. I can TOTALLY see why people buy these babies. You can get that lamination done in your PJs.
This photograph was taken when he was about 24 years old; at that time he was modeling for Monet as a favor and painting at his side, but his style was really not impressionism. It was a gorgeous style just his own and he had hardly begun to develop it when his years were ended. I felt from the first time I saw his picture that I loved him.
how they shiver
Head on over to check out all the new products, papers, and embellishments--this is the best book yet!
-Bryan is cut off on the top with forearms.
And why doesn't the spellls chekr wokr?
It’s taking a lot to not count the countdown unintentionally–sort of how you can’t look at words without reading them. It just happens. Easy math. Subtracting myself from my current life.
Grace and Vern do have a few moments of awkwardness when he’s in human form—and she gets just a little miffed at his undercover persona—but you’ll have to read the book for that one.
Under the leadership of Heracles, the Men of the Lion formed the secular, militant branch of the Black Star conspiracy. Joining in a common cause with the lower orders of priests, these warriors created a conspiracy of arms, waiting for the order to fight against the Nephilim in the name of Humanity.
I have yet to map out my plan of action. I wish I had someone to muscle around everything I want to take. If I could take a pack mule, literally, I would. He/she could carry my purse, my bags, my laptop, my cameras, and me if I got tired. And don't forget, bottles of water, a diet coke, mints to keep the mouth fresh, you know all those very much needed things. Since I am new to all of this, I really am not sure what I am doing LOL, but I'll betcha I come out unscathed albeit tired when it is over with and then, zoom, it is over to Spring Market at Bartel Hall.
Brownell, C. A., Svetlova, M., & Nichols, S. (2009). To Share or Not to Share: When Do Toddlers Respond to Another’s Needs?. Infancy, 14(1), 117-130. doi:10.1080/15250000802569868
Network marketing is all about building friendships with people, rather than trying to sell them on the next “snake oil” scam. Veteran networkers who have been in the industry for a while, all instead know it as simply, “the friends for life club”.
For your birthday I think you should indeed be a little naughty. After all, your lives for the past few months have been a roller coaster, and you've had to focus on the needs of everyone else. So here is my naughty (and slightly sneaky suggestion).
And to all my Christian friends, a blessed Advent!
It has taken a while to settle into a new routine and for some time I found myself standing back, silently observing the daily chores of farm life, whilst feeling a little lost about my place here. But now, almost two weeks in, I wake with newfound energy wondering what the day will bring, filled with the realisation that my body – and mind – are absorbing what they so craved.
Frank (Just Frank) - Jalousie
Q: States of Undress plays with images of the female body, anatomy, and clothing (that is often being removed); what I like best about this series is that you explore these ideas with embroidery. What inspires you about the body (especially female), about stitching on clothing that is coming off? Where did this series begin, and how has it developed for you? How do your materials factor in?
My progress for Paisley Ponyz is not nearly as quick as I had hoped. February is already half over. Yikes! I have been battling a bug for about 3 weeks now. I am so thankful my 2 year old has not gotten it yet. I am also taking on a small part time job with big potential to turn into something much bigger. Lets not forget that I also applied for the "Extreme Mustang Makeover". I am beside myself waiting to hear if I am accepted.
We were planning to go on holiday this week, but have cancelled it (hadn't booked yet, but we wanted to see more of the UK. We've done enough traveling for now....
"A Zionist lie.
Wilson Community College in North Carolina offers a certificate program in home weatherization and features the use of a carbon footprint calculator in a required course.
On a side note, I've revamped my blog up a bit! It looks a lot more customized now, no? A lot more pink and frilly, that's for sure. Maybe I'll whip up a new banner when I have time as well (:
NAMA has never confirmed that it acquired the INBS loan secured by 20, Grosvenor Square but it would seem to fit the NAMA eligibility criteria in the NAMA Act, that is, that the loan was with a NAMA Participating Institution (INBS) and was for development. Although NAMA expects to pay just 30c in the euro for INBS loans generally, it is likely that the agency paid far more for this loan. That said, it is understood that NAMA has made a substantial profit on the transaction.
If thou couldst speak
O’Reilly: I told you the other night that NBC News runs MSNBC. It’s the same management. I also told you they use the same people. Andrea Mitchell is the chief foreign affairs correspondent for NBC News. Here’s what she said yesterday on MSNBC:
I remember thinking about some of the things Mr. Paul had told me, I thought about some things from the dream before this, I thought about Flynn’s situation, I thought about what some of my former classmates told me, and probably more as I took a moment to think.
But the book gave instructions to mix the ingredients too much, so I knew that wouldn't work.
These suggestion are also aimed to be a source of irritation because they constitute a cheat. And an irritation is associated with an irritant, which may help ignite the immune system and lead to an inflammation. This is a common association with cancer and the reason is that an irritation is felt and reacted to.
RS: Marquis Maze, Alabama
Its true this has been a very difficult time for the British National Party since May 6th. In fact the morale of the foot soldiers has been at rock bottom since realistically speaking we were given a good hiding at the ballot box. On Merseyside it was always going to be a difficult task here and the results were more or less what we expected. There were a few exceptions where the party was "expected" to do a lot better around the country, where in the end we also failed abysmally.
even read the post, didn't you?? I know !! I have done that before too and then went back up and read the
In almost every possible way.
Where the realistic idea concludes
Finally, my friend, David H. Brown, has penned a classic mystery, Murder at 250 Center Street, ($15.99, Author House) with a plot that has so many twists and turns you will not want to stop reading. From abandoned newborn fraternal twins found in an apartment building basement after eight days, to their teenage mother being shot to death shortly after delivery, to a lapse of two decades when the murder weapon is found, the story just rockets along, buoyed by a great cast of characters, more deaths, a bizarre trial, and much more. They used to call such a novel a pot boiler because the lid was sure to blow at any moment. Treat yourself to this one.
For today, I reflect on all the times when you felt fortunate and when all was going right in your world. Remember how you felt and what it took to get there.
Pythagoras
But before I tell you any of his ideas, I’ll bet that there are some folks asking why we need to consider new ways of doing church in the first place. Well, simply, because by nearly every measure the ways we’ve been doing things for a long time just aren’t working so well anymore. Membership, across denominations, is down. Participation, especially by that coveted “younger people” demographic, is down. The perception that the church is a relevant institution in today’s world is way down. And all of this is especially true among the kinds of liberal and progressive folk who either are or who might be interested in becoming Unitarian Universalists. Something’s not working.
La croisade des enfants: ‘The Goliard’s Narrative’, ‘The Leper’s Narrative’, ‘The Narrative of Pope Innocent III’, ‘Narrative of Three Little Children’, ‘Narrative of François Longuejoue, Clerk’, ‘The Kalandar’s Narrative’, ‘Little Allys’ Narrative’, ‘The Narrative of Pope Gregory IX’.
Compound words is the name of the game this week in Room 10. And, I guess that synonyms and antonyms are the middle and last names of the game too.
So what about all these other gorgeous places in the 4e arrondissement? I tell you what--I'll sprinkle pictures of Notre Dame, the Hôtel-de-Ville, and l'Île de Saint Louis throughout other posts as I prepare for the vacation. And rest assured, you'll be seeing lots more of the 4e during the trip itself!
Apart from the above blogs promoting other poets to ‘hang’ their poems on their blogs, there are of course many poets who publish their own beautiful haiku and other poetic styles on their sites. Beautiful photographs accompany many of these. These are just a few poets
We are the Boss, unless we allowed others to be boss.
Kea’s live on the South Island and are supposed to be the smartest birds in the world. We haven’t been to the South Island yet, but we have seen them in Nga Manu (a nature reserve). When they fly, a beautiful bright orange on the innerside of their wings becomes visible. Another kea. Also from a photo by Corey Mosen.
The questions before and after elections are now on how much was given and recieved than how good were the visions and programs of candidate or elected officials.
Of course, much of this is not really so much about the comfort of the pets but more often about indulging the neuroses, obsessions, and compulsions of the pet owners themselves. Fortunately, pets are typically happy to oblige.
We also love meeting our customers.
Others started laughing. I put hand on Chandan’s mouth and started watching ‘show’ again!
purposes. Users of internet services provided by iiNet infringed copyright in the appellants' films by making the appellants' films available online using the BitTorrent peer-to-peer file sharing system. The Australian Federation Against Copyright Theft, on behalf of the appellants, served notices on iiNet ("the AFACT notices") alleging that iiNet's customers had infringed copyright in the appellants' films, and requiring iiNet to take action to prevent the infringements from continuing. iiNet took no action in response to the AFACT notices.
A big selling point of a lot of weight loss plans is that you get to “eat whatever you want” just in smaller portions. Do they think we’re stupid? Of course you can’t eat whatever you want. Whatever you want is usually really unhealthy. Is it okay to eat nothing but ice cream as long as you limit yourself to 1200 calories of it a day?
— Edgar Wallace
A 2006 survey by the Society for Human Resource Management found that 84 percent of employers drug test new hires, and 39 percent will randomly test employees after they are hired. (Usually, those who meet the criteria for being able to have medical marijuana are excused.)
It has six chairs, which are currently being re-upholstered. Before they had a yellow vinyl on them, but I chose a vinyl that looks like brown leather for the seat and a tapestry type fabric with big paisleys on it for the back. It's below. It looks much nicer in person though, the colors are richer than in this picture. This looks kind of drab.
A huge wave was threatening her peace and equanimity. Immediately a voice inside said “it’s only a thought”, and immediately things arose such as: if I this suffering is not experienced then the tortured will be betrayed. If a total wave of revulsion and contraction does not arise and is not nurtured, then his suffering will not be alleviated. – it would be devalued by not paying attention to it. An accident with that much pain and suffering could be integrated but that someone can deliberately inflict that brutality upon another human was just inconceivable to her.
I'm originally from Atlanta and oh how I love it. I always wanted to go back there and work someday. My family still lives there as does my best friend. So imagine my surprise when my inbox lit up with a message from Coca-Cola inviting me to their Conversations with Coca-Cola blogging conference.
*For cookies I used Nabisco Chunky Chips Ahoy. You'll need 26 cookies for this recipe.
But beyond the railings there was no school.
Hope to really enjoy the apartment this weekend.. maybe I can get over to the Home Depot at some point and purchase some nice things. Jon will be back soon and then I will be all scatter brained again. :)
It (the Internet) pretends the information is secure, but only a blind fool believes this. It tells us that privacy is an old-fashioned, out-of-date concept. It is reassuring in its pervasiveness.
Shayna
I was in a cycle of tragedy. You can’t forget one, so then when the next occurs, the spiral descends deeper, making everything feel sharp while you feel raw and defenseless. I barely left the house for a year, aside from going to work. I developed an addiction to Magic: The Gathering so that I would be forced to play games and communicate with others at least once a week. What I should have been doing all that time was reconnecting with the teenage angst I so thoroughly displayed in high school via a now decaying Livejournal. I should have been capturing every fit of despair and loneliness. Every ounce of dread and disillusionment.
“Of course I can sew,” I snapped, “but, my sewing machine gave up the ghost twenty years ago. You’re the one making the doll, I thought you would sew it.”
Cory Doctorow taught me that every writer has strengths and weaknesses, and that good writers acknowledge this.
290 12. Book Review: Subrahmanyan Chandrasekhar, Newton’s “Principia” for the Common Reader. The Great Ideas Today, vol. 1997, pp. 448-54 (Encyclopedia Britannica, 1997). See Item C-1997(1), above.
stripped that I might be clothed,
Last Sunday I managed to see the John Piper show at Towner, just a couple of hours before it closed. An interesting experience: as anticipated there was some fabulous work from the 1930s, especially those collaged visions of Newhaven and other places on the south coast. Some of the later work was less fun, but all in all a lovely exhibition that confirmed my view that you often have to travel out of London to see the best work by British artists. Can we have Paul Nash in Kent and Sussex next?
'He writes with such humour and passion that you can’t put the book down.' Review on Amazon
Look, the thing is - this is OUR party. We were here first. We don't need you here. WE ARE THE WORLD. That's WE, not you. Where were you in 1985, when we were all cheering on Status Quo at Wembley, just to keep Mengistu in Courvoisier and SAMs? You're basically a late gatecrasher. Just fuck off to Mars, you stupid, mewling brat.
Open That Bottle Night was created by Dorothy J. Gaiter and John Brecher back in 2000. At the time, they were well respected wine writers at the Wall Street Journal. Their idea was that most of us who enjoy wine have a bottle (or two) that we have been saving for a special occasion, but we can never quite decide what constitutes a special enough of a reason. So we hold on to those wines ad nauseum, and they eventually decline and we cry and kick ourselves for being idiots. So OTBN is an excuse to open one or more of these bottles so that we can avoid self-flagellation.
So you have to try and get everything set up then either set the timer, run round, get into place and adopt the right posture and expression before the camera goes click, or you need something like a cable or remote release that allows you to trigger the shutter from a distance – at least if you want to avoid the other cliché of holding the camera at arms length and just pointing it at you.
A roll down a grassy hill
Here are some photos from the last few months:
You gave me everything you had, oh you gave me light
See me to my eternal sleep
With that, I'm giving these earrings away!
The short story that evolved changed everything except the suicide fact and one character’s volunteering at a distress centre. The characters were younger, brother and sister, and the story was told from the sister’s point of view. It started with her big brother’s suicide and then went back to their life, including growing up with a mother who was an alcoholic and verbally abused her children. This definitely was not the situation in my family. In my story, the sister was filled with guilt and she felt that she should have been able to stop her brother, especially as she was volunteering at a telephone distress center. I made up the name of the distress centre and what “happens” at the fictional distress centre did not happen with my actual volunteering. For those interested, the story “My Brother’s Keeper” was published in the Canadian Authors Association Toronto branch anthology, Gathered Streams (Hidden Brook Press, 2010). Check out http://www.canauthorstoronto.org/anthology.html.
“Is there anything one wouldn’t do for one’s cat, Letizia?”
I think we could all achieve this enormous potential,
3. Engage their ideas and solutions for mishaps or customer/client dissatisfaction during these meeting.
while....
Fourth card is distant past - could be up to 2 years ago. This card can be dark, but remember it's the past. Your distant past card is the X of cups.
Prepare the grill for medium-high heat. Remove the pork chops from the beer brine, discard the brine and pat the chops dry. For the rub, in a small bowl, mix the garlic, pepper, salt and sage. Rub the garlic mixture over both sides of the pork chops.
Accessory617 (sold out) (click for pic). Haha, I couldn't resits buying two of these. I knew that one day, I'll force a friend to wear one.
She doesn't mind handling breast milk. Not that I'm providing it anymore, because I don't have a pump. But when I did, it was never an issue. You wouldn't believe how many people do have an issue with this.
Start: Wye Station TR048470
Round 6: (1 HDC in next, 2 HDC in next) around. (60 HDC)
“Strong, coherent fundamental research is yielding good results,” says Jaiwon Shin, associate administrator for aeronautics. “We have a lot of good technologies being worked on, but if you ignore the water filling up the dam, something bad will happen.”
I want to travel the world, but I have to work for months just to save up enough money to get my ass to France. Surely something needs to be done.
Compensable workers’ compensation claims have specific characteristics that will help you determine if and when an injury is covered.
Grand Champion went to “Nature at Its Best” by Tina Hale of WesBanco Bank. Tina decoupaged images from the Vinton County Visitors’ Guide on the turkey. She will receive the $400 grand prize and her turkey will be used as the model for large fiberglass turkey that will be placed on the street.
In a casserole dish, combine onions, buttermilk and 1/2 cup hot sauce. Allow to soak for about 2 hours.
First we've got what would have been Douglas Adams' 60th birthday on Sunday. Neil Gaiman says (and you have to do what he says): "To celebrate this event, Douglas' family and friends, in association with 'Save The Rhino' (one of Douglas' favourite charities) are holding a very special birthday celebration in his honour at the Hammersmith Apollo in London. An evening's entertainment from some of the finest names in the world of science, comedy, entertainment and music, with a very special premiere performance of Douglas' material, this is one event that is definitely not to be missed."
The final round is the ‘pose down’. The finalists go through the relaxed poses and mandatory poses like in the first two rounds before being given 60 second or longer in a free-for-all pose down, where all the finalists get to go up against each other and trade their best poses with each other.
The author, William Landay, has done a wonderful job combining the investigative and courtroom drama with the more significant human drama that plays out.
The map even missed the burger boom outlined by the Brooklyn Paper, which, that article suggests, is partly driven by the arena for Five Guys, but not for 67 Burger.
In studying Isaiah, I found more verses that showed the Heavenly Trio.
When we last left our intrepid knitter, she had just learned how to make a sock, and had started to realize the benefits of knitting.
The first time I agreed to take up a permanent job was when I was 27 years of age. And all I could agree to was 24 hours. I quite frankly panicked. Me, trapped in one place? What if I didn’t like it? I wouldn’t be able to just run when I felt like it!
Philosophically speaking, the biggest secret to success in any endeavour is a simple matter of showing up. That is showing up day after day and doing the things that you are supposed to be doing until you succeed. Sounds rather simple, and it is really.
Mother's Day is a wonderful sentiment: "To honor your mother and make her feel extra-special today more than any other day."
I debated over-ruling her choices, but decided that I could re-paint if it was truly terrible.
If you have more than one child, or if you grew up in a family with brothers and / or sisters, you know that siblings can be the best of friends, but they also know how to really do things or say things that hit hard.
kthxbai
What a odious cynic you are.’
The only hope within him lies,
After eight or so hours, we broke off watching episodes for the Q&A. In attendance were Martin Starr (Bill Haverchuck), Sarah Hagan (Millie), Steve Bannos (Mr. Kowchevski), Stephen Lea Sheppard (Harris), and Dave 'Gruber' Allen (Mr. Rosso). Messrs. Bannos and Allen were the most effusive and excited which I chalk up to them being older and more appreciative. Bannos was also a writer on the show so he had more insight. Only two questions in and we were heard the terrible news of how the show was cancelled soon after creator Paul Feig's mother died. What a double gut punch that must have been.
And there are some many layers of decoupage that they almost feel
We set off on our school’s first teacher led learning walk armed with information from a brief orientation along with the following reflective, nonjudgmental statement and question prompts:
1 plate
For the Febuary Issue of HB ( Harpers Baazar) Kim Kardashian graces the cover as a egyptian Cleopatra and gets fab for the new issue. She even gets the chance to chat it up with her idol, Elizabeth Taylor. The 30 year old reality star looked posh in the page spread and a few natural non-cleo photogs as well. So what do you think, does Kimmy do Cleo justice? The star goes on to say, " I would absolutely characterize myself as ambitious." She also dishes on relationships, her budding music career and her friendship with music mogul Kanye West.
1305 **D-III/5/1999. “Plutarch, Heroes and the Divine.” First Friday Lecture Series, The Basic Program, The University of Chicago, The Cultural Center, Chicago Public Library, Chicago, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item C-1999(4), above, pp. 724- 34.) See Item C-2000(5), above.
If you are interested in Beta reading, please send me an e-mail to freefullife@gmail.com. I will get the draft to you as soon as you e-mail me. Thanks, I hope to hear from you soon.
Personally speaking I cannot wait to experience the new product (as the current 360 seat preview isn’t active at time of post), sipping a champagne off the new cocktail table, and hope that the comfort and quality actually lives up to what the first images actually portrait. Well done Virgin, it seems, you’ve done it yet again!
These are the hands that will passionately love you and cherish you
I will also request from the SAPS a full report into:
Grandma said everything was toast for a long time. At first I didn’t understand, but she explained a word may have more than one meaning. It still sounds funny.
Milan Petrović: So far, except the calendar that I’ve previously mentioned, there are none that are not controversial or disputed by scholars.
Boxing Correspondent
All I can smell is his hair after a bath, that soft baby smell of Johnson and Johnson. All I can feel is his warm smooth skin, so white it was almost glowing even in broad daylight. All I can focus on are those beautiful green/hazel eyes, those eyes that bespoke of a huge intelligence even back then.
Woa, its been a while!!! I have been having a mammoth attack of the starties only this time it was so bad and my brain so scattered, I never got past the thinking about it stage. In the end it all came out in a mad rush. I will now share the first of my creative meltdown .
Upon walking into my bedroom last night there on the floor at the end of my bed is a fledgling...in pieces, many pieces. I'll spare you a photo of that & let you use your imagination.
Race Admissions – 5K (several positions)
For scratches attained and,
take one for the team
here was a super easy project that i had seen at a couple other blogs. i asked my son to bring me home some pallets from work. He is so awesome that he brought them that afternoon! i immediately got to work saw up what i needed to make the two shelves. i used pallet word to fill the bottom of the shelves so my books wouldn't fall through and knock out the cat :)
But, I will do it!! I’ve already started this with getting my craft area organized. I’m going to continue with my craft area. There are tons of things that still need to be done with it. All the scrapbook papers and school papers and bills and photos. *SIGH* I can do this! Deep breaths!
Chopped apricots
Attainability: UNKNOWN
If you've never heard of the Eurovision Song Contest, you're really missing something special. It's a Europe-wide singing contest (with an absolutely outrageous production value) that's been going on for 56 years. It's a big deal. Little European kids with songs in their hearts aspire to one day represent their country at Eurovision. I won't go into details of how it works -- all you need to know to enjoy Eurovision is each country comes with a song, a singer, and a dream.
A sharp knock rattled the heavy oak doors. “Come in,” the queen cried in a commanding voice.
I’m looking forward to tomorrow night, when I should have a few helpers after choir. There are still three raised beds to fill, and an awful lot of ivy and weeds to deal with. There won’t be time to do a lot before it gets dark, but with a group of us we might get quite a lot done.
The ANZAC story is inherently masculine and militaristic, one that overrides many other developments in the nation of Australia. Moreover, the story simplifies the diverse experiences of Australian soldiers during war. One example is ‘The Bullecourt Digger’, whose plague reads ‘(he) is sturdy, arcadian, audacious and resolute’. Are we to believe that every Australian soldier serving abroad had these characteristics? The very notion is absurd. Interestingly, many Australian memorials along the front have only emerged in the past twenty years through the auspices of the federal government, who have also spent millions promoting the ANZAC legend in schools across Australia. One has to ask the question: to what extent has this historical narrative been promoted in order to detract from our tragic colonial past, which most observers now equate with a form of genocide? (To find out more about the ANZAC legend I would really recommend reading ‘Whats Wrong with ANZAC? The Militarisation of Australian History’).
I was a student at NYU in the mid-70s when a film crew took over 9th avenue (aka Prospect Park West) around the corner from my home on 17th Street in Windsor Terrace. Some old storefronts were reconfigured into a bank and the great Al Pacino, fresh from his Godfather 2 triumph, explored a new character in Sidney Lumet's classic Dog Day Afternoon. Sharing the screen was another remarkable actor, John Cazale, probably best known as Fredo in the Godfather series. Cazale appeared in only 5 films before he succumbed to cancer at the age of 42 but they were all critical, box office and Oscar favorites. A mainstay of the New York off-Broadway theater scene, Cazale was an enormous talent, and director Richard Shepard (Scotland, PA and The Matador) has created a touching and fascinating film portrait of his too brief career.
Hey guys! Thanks for joining us today on our Fibromyalgia Blog Hop! I was asked by a sweet friend Alice to participate and I am excited to bring at least some kind of awareness so if you'd like to start from the beginning, please visit her blog at http://giagarcianewlifenewbeginning.blogspot.com/. **I tried SO hard to link that but Blogger is not letting me** I'll admit, I have heard of some of my friends talk about Fibromyalgia but never truly looked it up until recently. Just want to send my thoughts to all of you affected by this, I know how hard it can be but you guys are so strong for continuing your day to day lives :)
¼ tsp. chili powder
You accepted his proposal whole-hardheartedly!”
Luckily the excitement must have been too much for him, or maybe we were getting close to town, because he decided not to make another visit. So I walked the rest of the way having adrenaline fueled conversations in my head as I tried to work out the most cutting thing I could have said to him to have a deflating effect.
to make them extra sweet with 0 Calories. Picture #2: 1 small or
Every house tells a story. Who lived here before you? What did they do? How did they live? Was there more happiness and laughter than sorrow and pain? Were children born here? Did anyone die here? Why did they leave? Where did they go? These are just some of the questions that fill my mind when I look at a house, especially an old house.
Now start living!
* Gas at the pump
14. Eva's Holy Dress (Deep Down 3) (01:33)
“I must have sinned and I deserve the situation I am in.”
The First Lady is encouraging parents to cook with their kids, in order to boost their nutrition education, and Chef Comerford said the pizzas are a good project. The recipe is a large one, enough for three pies.
Just yesterday when a bank staff called, I told her my concern, and she was laughing away. I think she got it that she is doing something unnecessary, and this unnecessary job is giving her the salary she wanted. I told her to let me know what is the information provided instead of me giving her the info since I don't know if she is really the bank staff. Furthermore, the bank number is recorded as Private Number. How many times have we heard of scam through phone? I gonna be really careful. I told the bank staff that she might be one that holding the application form, filing up the information I gave through the phone, and apply on behalf of me instead since I don't know how real she is. Therefore, asking her to give me the information instead ensuring that's what I am filing up. Don't it work that way?
Let's hope humans can love them as much as cameras clearly do!
That night, while Curtis and Trim are forced to take Trim’s grandmother’s car to make a big money run for Andre, Reese broadsides the hell out of them with their own Escalade. If you’ve read my reviews before, you’ve seen me sing the praises of Michael Emerson for his ability to use facial expressions to enhance the scene. This time, it’s Jim Caviezel, who walks up to the crash victims, gives them a creepy little face, and says, “Found your car.” Nice.
Good, I didn’t do anything differently than what you would do, it is basic interaction with someone and it’s somehow surprising. I think people got that idea from the content of my first album. When your back is completely against the wall, you become a victim. You have to do exactly what you have to do to prevent becoming a victim. That is what the aggression in that first record was from. Some people misinterpreted it, but it’s just because they didn’t have that experience. The things you go through make you who you are. (The contents of this interview was obtained via the-talks.com)
In Psalm 124, the psalmist makes it very clear the impact of the Lord on the people of Israel. “If it had not been the Lord who was on our side….”. Things wouldn’t have gone so well. Here are the facts – the people of Israel were able to endure because God was with them. Plain and simple. There is no other way they would have made it. And that is true for us too. Whether we recognize it or not, we are able to live life because God is with us. We can easily see the way the Israelites would have been wiped off the face of the earth many times over in scripture. And the fact is that when people are able to look back at our lives over time – they are going to see a very similar story – we lived because God was on our side.
Supplies - Card size is 5 1/2" x 4 1/4" - All supplies CTMH
My pilgrimage to Third Man was the last destination before I reached the Words family homestead in New Jersey. However, I did stop for the night in Harrisonburg, Virginia. I imagine that will eventually be the most notable thing to happen in Harrisonburg.
When I write, it is from my heart as I have been told. I am beginning to see and believe it. I feel that there is no "right" style here in my blog. IT is MY personal blog for me to share what it is I want. AND, what I want to share is laughter, smiles, my joys, my sadness, my desires, my challenges...whatever my heart feels...it wants to truly share.
Dries said he and his sister Zeldi van Straten, 43, were deeply concerned about their mother because she has heart problems and high blood pressure.
Veterinary staff treating horses with phosphine poisoning have also become sick, according to the American Veterinary Medical Association, which issued guidelines this year for vets regarding phosphine products. Besides rodent bait, these include aluminum phosphide, an insecticide used to fumigate grains and animal feed.
Whatever you do, do not let ‘not having anyone to go with’ be a reason for not going travelling.
Mental slavery is the strongest and most pernicious of all slaveries, but it has one vital weakness: when the chains break, there IS NO GOING BACK. The mind, once freed, can never more be cast in chains. And a free mind makes a free human, and free humans resist against the system EVERY F*CKING STEP OF THE WAY.
Why I didn't get his picture is beyond me, although after he told me to go on down to the dock and take as many pictures as I wanted--any time I wanted--giddiness set in. So I neglected to take his picture in all my euphoria.
Who are 99anger?
I went over it in some length about how it's unlikely you'd make a confession to someone who wasn't important, how that importance, that drive to communicate it just made it that much more to lose and how drastically the recipient (if he's not already established gay) could potentially react to the disclosure of featuring in a buddy's romantic fantasies.
Each probe pushes the boundaries of the Ummah a tiny bit further outwards. These are not physical boundaries, but legal, social, and cultural boundaries. Every small success makes the host country resemble Islam just a little bit more, and helps prepare the colonized victims by making them accustomed to the nature of the Islamic state.
We’ve had a busy week since our 3rd visitor just spent 5 days with us, but sadly has now left to continue his travels. He is Erich, the husband of Rob’s manager from a job many years ago. Our kids were basically an unknown entity to him before he came, but now he has a REAL good idea about what they are like! He was great fun to have around, and he introduced many silly games to them as well as the song “Feliz Navidad”. Unfortunately, it is one of those songs that NEVER leaves your brain, and so I think that is all we will be singing until well after Christmas is over.
Digitally Agile Scotland Seminar
One Sunday at church our pastor took some pottery and broke it into shards. He gave each of us a piece. We wrote down something we struggled with and then placed our brokeness on the cross.
Just round the back of the Royal Scottish Academy building on the mound (also by William Playfair who built the Edinburgh city observatory two blogs ago) is this. It's called Kandylaki (Shrine to abandoned christmas trees) by Juliana Capes. As far as I can see a kandylaki is a little roadside shrine quite common in Greece - I saw quite a few in Poland too last year.
These folks are another South Congress establishment. They carry a wide variety of high quality brands including such as Lucchese, Ariat and Old Gringo. They may not tell the same local Austin story as Heritage, but damn are they nice boots. Not only will my fellow Austin friends vouch for this fine retailer, but they hit all the right price points – I’ve never seen someone leave there unhappy.
Hope you all are having a great week, my lovely readers! Thanks for stopping by. =)
Most of the literature associates empowerment with personal control, an aspect of life that many individuals who experience symptoms of psychosis or mania may end up loosing permanently.
And I always wonder...
¾ tsp bicarbonate of soda
Donald L. Bren
As much mud in the streets as if the waters had but newly retired from the face of the earth … Smoke lowering down from chimney-pots, making a soft black drizzle, with flakes of soot in it as big as full-grown snow-flakes — gone into mourning, one might imagine, for the death of the sun. Dogs, undistinguishable in mire. Horses, scarcely better; splashed to their very blinkers. Foot passengers, jostling one another's umbrellas in a general infection of ill-temper, and losing their foot-hold at street-corners, where tens of thousands of other foot passengers have been slipping and sliding since the day broke (if the day ever broke), adding new deposits to the crust upon crust of mud, sticking at those points tenaciously to the pavement, and accumulating at compound interest.
Hazem Abu Ismail, the latest Presidential candidate put forward by the Islamic Brotherhood in Egypt – has as his not entirely original election slogan, ‘Islam is the Solution’. But Islam doesn’t have the solution to Hazem’s mum. A TV Kor’aan-waving imam, Ismail was the ultra-conservative Salafists’ candidate for the Egyptian presidency. But now his candidacy is over, because it has emerged that his mother – gone to meet Allah these many years since – once applied for a green card to live and work in the United States.
had made it this far.
of Life are on their way,
"That's not where we came from," she said.
For a people proud of itself, whose life is ascending, always thinks of another kind of being as a lower, less valuable kind of being; it regards the strange, the unknown world as its enemy, as its opposite; it feels no inquisitiveness, it totally rejects the strange--A people would never admit that another people was the "true people."--
But you've forgotten the barriers that have already come down. The testimonies you once raved about and how good God has been on the journey.
The Bureau of Economic Analysis (BEA) released the advance estimate of real GDP growth for the first quarter of 2012. The advance estimate shows real GDP grew at a seasonally adjusted annual rate of 2.2 percent. This is a deceleration from a 3.0 percent rate in the fourth quarter of 2011. The deceleration was the result of slowing inventory investment and declining non-residential fixed investment.
I was one of the lucky ones to be invited!
In a webinar presented by Ralph Craft, Ph.D., Senior Transportation Specialist, FMCSA Office of Analysis, Research, and Technology (ART) with Kirse Kelly, Web Conference Host, FMCSA ART, Kelly spoke about misconceptions involved in large truck crash statistics. In the presentation, Kelly stated, “Being unable to perform the task of driving means you are asleep, you are in diabetic shock so you can’t drive, or you have had a heart attack, or passed out, or any other medical condition that hits you and now you are no longer able to perform the task of driving.” Notice that being obese was not mentioned.
“Bush is an Accursed Satan”
Tattoo-shops, consulates . . .
I can understand if you’re against fake tanning, since it is bad for you….but damn girl wear some tights or something.
The point of all this is: as dissimilar as the worlds of the stock market and the publishing industry may at first seem, there are a lot of parallels. Publishing is a business. Research and a working understanding of the market are essential for success. Yes, your writing has to be good enough. Yes, you have to have a great story. But you also have to convince people to spend their hard-earned cash on that story.
For example, my friend owns a feed store, and among other things, supplies hay, chicken feed, dog food, and food for horses. On the Google site, I entered the store’s URL, chose “livestock feed” as the category, and let the site search for keywords. Voila! Google provided a list of words that should be included in press releases, articles and other content. The three most searched words for the site were pet and feed, pet feed, and animal feed, followed by feed supply, farm supplies, feed store and store and feed. With Google Trends you can get insight into the traffic and geographic visitation pattern for your website.
A-Maying in the woods,
But I wasn't going to let my lackluster first time get me down; I had found my new favorite thing to do on Saturday nights. Blackwell Theater, which had hosted the screenings, was a small, two-screen theater that had been struggling for business since the dawn of the multiplex. And they announced, on that magical Saturday, that there was enough interest in Rocky Horror that they were going to screen it every Saturday at midnight (technically Sunday morning) from then on. Hot patootie! Bless my soul!
And how did we recover from a busy Mothers Day Saturday? Don't you know the minute GG and I got a few extra pence in our pockets and an hour to spare we were off to a nursery?
Much of the problem lies in the fact that while Malcolm's early life of crime and love of lindy-hopping is fascinating, it doesn't justify taking up more than a third of the film's 201-minute running time with Lee's stylized, nostalgic look at that chapter. While it is important and inspiring to see where Malcolm came from and what he overcame, the reason Malcolm X is well-known is because of what he did following his prison conversion to Islam, not before.
1. Jessica Rabbit - Who Framed Roger Rabbit
In this incarnation you are confused and not having any fun at all, naught of course meaning nothing. You are questioning the importance of sexual pleasure in your life and celibacy seems to be viable path after all. You are still trying to erase from your mind the terrifying image you just saw in the mirror. EYE BLEACH PLEASE! You are reaching for a Kleenex only to find the box empty. You thank your God for long sleeves and privacy.
Fleece absorbs moisture and traps it between its fibers. These covers are custom made to fit your little one. They can be used over cloth diapers, disposable diapers, and even underwear for your little one who is potty training.
That should produce some hurried denials or justifications, which will provide DS with good information concerning whether he should be bothering with her at all. It sounds to me as if she's been relegated to a horse in the other guy's stable or otherwise demoted, which is why she's simultaneously bad-mouthing him and continuing to see him. DS has to realize that he may be of lower rank than the other guy, which means he has to up her perception of his rank or she's going to prefer part-time other guy to full-time him.
There is an awful lot of running up and down corridors, but that is to be expected.
It was the tear streaked face of a 33 year old woman, who had just watched her last baby board his first school bus............
3. Bake cranberries for 35 minutes, stirring twice during baking. Remove from dish into a bowl, cover and refrigerate.
I'm newish to blogging and I just love this bloggy community. I am a second year, special education teacher so I'm going to talk about how you can make having a kiddo with an IEP in your room NBD (no big deal). Thanks so much for having me here Gladys!
7 Wonders is a fun game because it’s quick to pick up and understand (despite what my description above may read like to you, it’s actually fairly straightforward to learn even if you’re a complete board game newbie) and fast-paced. There’s little in the way of “analysis paralysis” as people agonise over which cards to play, and you can get through an entire game in well under an hour. Despite its brisk pace, it has plenty of depth, though, and various randomised elements provide each session with a degree of variety.
Reporter: “Coach, what if the NCAA gets in your face and won’t stop?”
But let us start with Herbert Spencer (pictured at right), the man who is always cast as the villain of the tale and the “founder” of the Social Darwinist “movement.” A writer for one British paper insists Spencer was “a downright evil man . . . whose passion for eugenics and elimination made him the daydreamer of things to come.” Edwin Black, in his history of eugenics, War Against the Weak, writes that Spencer “completely denounced charity and instead extolled the purifying elimination of the ‘unfit.’ The unfit, he argued, were predestined by their nature to an existence of downwardly spiraling degradation.” Hofstadter himself wrote that the (almost wholly progressive) eugenics movement in America “has proved to be the most enduring aspect” of Spencer’s “tooth-and-claw version of natural selection.”
Tomorrow Sean is taking an important step in his educational career. He is walking at the EIU Graduation for his master's degree. He has finished his administration degree to be a school principal. So be nice or you may get a detention! I am so proud of his accomplishments. He has finished this degree while teaching full-time, coaching three sports (one of which he is the head coach), and being a Youth & Government Advisor. He is considering going back to get his Doctorate and becoming a superintendent. Dr. Docherty has a nice ring to it, huh? lol
One place where Louis himself has balanced, in a literal sense, that respect for both history and technology is in his job of overseeing the making of the Sesame balloons for the Macy's Thanksgiving Day Parade in New York City. For this special event that is witnessed annually around the globe, Louis has supervised the construction of both the Super Grover and Big Bird balloons as well as the float that the actors and Muppets ride on through the parade.
I’m reading Terry Pratchett’s Snuff and finding myself being drawn deeper and deeper into the story. It’s been a long time since I actually held a paper book and read with my eyes open; these days I prefer to listen to someone reading to me, usually people with great voices that make the characters come alive, and I can rest my eyes all the while. My friend pushed the Pratchett upon me. I’ve had it for ages, and the fact that she mentioned it the other day means that I’d better get it read. It’s great, and a very adult story which feels real world and not fantasy makes it very different from his other works.
Another tip to keep the bread moist and not dry, is to spray the counter with cooking spray instead of using flour to keep it from sticking.
Meditation is what allows me to have vision of myself in the present and in the future; it’s necessary to determine what i really want and where i want to be in my life.
The problem is in drawing the line between the two. Whilst we all want to be treated as locally as possible, how many of would really prefer to be treated by a team who’d never seen a case like ours, instead of by an experienced team which dealt with a number of cases each year, just in order to be more local? Give me the expertise any day. And that question is what
I hope you are having a wonderful December so far. We are! We are counting down the days for daddy to come home. We are in the single digits, finally. Another cause for celebration is all my presents have been purchased! I am just finishing up a few homemade projects and I will be finished. Woohoo! Now to wrap them all and mail some. So......
And then I received a baby tube of Diorshow New Look Mascara as a gift with purchase. I was skeptical, but since it was in my hands why not give it a try?
When Garbage announced their indefinite hiatus in 2005, on the heels of redeeming disc Bleed Like Me (I personally found Beautiful Garbage to be bland and forced, trying too hard to be what was commercially hip, right down to the promotional imagery), I was devastated. For my formative teens and early twenties, the alternative-electronic fusion of melody behind the sultry vocals of one Shirley Manson had been a mainstay, particularly their sophomore effort Version 2.0. As word came of Shirley’s solo album that never materialized in a travesty akin to the delay of Fiona Apple’s Extraordinary Machine and Nina Gordon’s Bleeding Heart Graffiti,I clung to leaked demos and longed for a new album.
to qualify for the drawing.
on the logistics side. i flew myself to windhoek, the capital of namibia. there i rented a small vw car (left-hand drive – what were they thinking?) that came with two spare tires, as do all cars in this end of the world. i also rented a mattress (the desert floor can be mean…), a tent and a sleeping bag. then i checked most of my stuff into storage at the cardboard box hostel in windhoek, namibia’s capital, and headed off to the place i wanted to photograph with my camera, my rolls of film and my trusty tripod. and bags and bags of biltong, the local spicy dried meat – yum!
I do not. I don't believe in insurance.
lava erupts over every bump
Shortly after I completed my drawing of the newborn fawn entitled “A Peaceful Spot,” Mindy let me know that she wanted another baby animal picture to hang on our wall. You see, our little fawn was looking kind of lonely hanging on our living room wall all by herself, and we thought she could use a friend. Also, Mindy revealed that she had envisioned decorating our baby’s room with baby animal pictures one day when we decide to start a family. For any of our family members or friends reading this, no, Mindy is not pregnant, so don’t read into this discussion about baby room decorations as anything more than thoughts for the future. Anyway, we started talking about what little forest friend I would venture to draw next, and after a little conversation, we settled on a baby raccoon. I agree with Mindy that baby raccoons look all cute and cuddly even if the adults are none too cute and can cause all kinds of havoc, especially around unsecured, full garbage cans.
The One Show remains the pinnacle of achievement by providing a showcase of the world’s best work, and by inviting collaboration among individuals who are actively developing outstanding work and within this the best in New Media advertising is recognized and awarded at One Show Interactive. With categories like Augmented Reality, Mobile Applications, and the new Social Media category, One Show Interactive reflects the ever-expanding realm of online and interactive work.
This beautiful quilt was made by the mother of Cystic Fibrosis fighter, Cheri. It was on display at the party and will be being raffled off at the opening of Waco's BJ's Restaurant in June.
J was a little more squirrelly than usual. We’ve been out of the church proper for almost three months, meeting in the social hall while repairs were made. He was very excited to be back in “the big church.” Usually we can get a solid five minutes of ease out of him upon our arrival, but today he was squatting atop the pew with Where’s Walrus wide open, rocking from side to side and talking a kind of bookish gibberish to himself. There’s always been a Gollum-esque quality to Jonah, minus the creepy “My preciousssss” obsessive chatter. It’s in the way he moves. He has a wonderful litheness about him—creaturely in a kooky but charming sort of way.
3. AVOID ARGUMENTS WITH THE FEMALES ABOUT LIFTING THE TOILET SEAT. USE THE SINK.
I loathe running. I’ve had a great running high once in my life, but in general, I just do not enjoy it. I realize it would be highly important in case Queen Mab confuses me for Harry Dresden, or the velociraptors escape, or if a zombie with only partially-dessicated legs decides to chase me after the apocalypse, but I just hate it. And fitness is supposed to be fun, right? RIGHT!
Embellishments: Flowers and gems from stash
She came downstairs a minimum of 10 times between 8:00 and 11:00.
have i really not seen all of the lord of the rings?
The Jeff Hardy segments are very interesting. Some people have forgiven him, some are not. So what will take place? We’ll tune in and find out.
Although the Lord is always in His supreme abode, He is nonetheless all-pervading by His material energy. So by His spiritual and material energies, He is present everywhere—in both the material and the spiritual universes. In Bhagavad-gītā, the words yasyāntaḥ-sthāni bhūtāni indicate that everything is sustained by Him, whether it be spiritual or material energy.
1 Part Butterscotch Schnapps
E- "I wish you had a fat lip so you could feel it too!"
John Wyndham – Survival
What Rosen’s comment did was to give the elephants and their megaphone, Fox News, grist for the mill to counter the other side pointing out that the Republicans are engaged in a war on women.
I can do as I want in life because I have no family to think about or care about or be responsible to or for---is that lucky---or unlucky----or is it what I deserve.
Or with large steps crossing the prairies out of Illinois and
Beef Wellington with mushroom duxelles & St. Bernardus ABT 12 - 10.5% ABV.
Quin - 5 inches long
….and some books…. some very good books….. I do love to read…. and look at pictures too….
December 24
Mankind’s endeavors to accomplish all kinds of enjoyment have advanced quite a bit over the years. The technology of the television set alone is still thought to be the most significant portions of this rich history. Through the years, the boob tube, as it had been at one time known as, has added fun in every living room, getting households to get together after supper and also, oftentimes stopping fathers from venturing out every evening with friends.
While the Transformer plates & napkins are really cool, they will totally blow your budget. Most kids won't even notice them anyway. Instead, buy 1 licensed item, such as napkins, and use solid partyware in coordinating colors for everything else. For example, at Wal-Mart you can purchase a package of 20 solid colored plates for $1.50 while a package of 8 Tinkerbell plates will cost $2.94.
Many never reach spiritual maturity because they don’t realize there’s something to reach for beyond the salvation experience. Christ is our example of obedience and maturity. He knew His purpose—to do the will of His Father. He knew why He was “sent” to earth, and why He was born of a woman. He also understood that His time on earth would be limited. Since Jesus came with His purpose already set before Him, He understood the importance of time management, setting priorities (what He was called to do, and what He was not), spending time with His Father for strength and encouragement, and how to make disciples.
Tintoretto painted his dead daughter
Not a bad quick meal, but not what I’d call a kitchen success either. Hence, this was leftover challenge take one. Must keep trying!
During the application process for the Truman scholarship, Dodds sought the counsel of Dr. Audra Jennings, director of the Office of Scholar Development, to help refine his application and work with him on interview preparation and technique.
Sindoor rests
I've got suddenly a bunch of questions of weird tiny backgrounds. I must tell now right in the beginning, that I still have no idea, why some of the backgrounds have shrunken. It must have to do something with Picasa, because I have stored all of them to my Picasa Album, and the links come straight from there.
see what the other grades are up to...don't get to do that enough!
The Cutting Back Kitchen will be moving!
Scaling options:
8) A length of rope tied to a support and leading into a dark hole under a stretch of broken concrete.
Sometimes (and by 'sometimes', I mean every single day), there is so much amazingness on the internet that I'm overwhelmed with the task of keeping up. Here are some awesome things I've found recently.
1 aside
If you've followed my blog since its upstart (actually @ xanga), you know that I fondly called my baby girl Cassie Girl from the moment we found out that we were indeed having a girl. She is most definitely still my sweet Cassie Girl and I just love her sweet little heart. She is QUITE strong-willed and stubborn, but we're working on that.
“Part of an old building just collapsed metres before me, on the street… God is smiling on me today! Earthquake?”
Nunhead is famous for two things: Ayres, the Baker, and Soper, the Fishmonger, which are always spoken of together, and for its dead cemetery.
Pray that as the ______________________ hear about Jesus, they will spread the Word.
Directors need to know this stuff, but so do novelists. Then there was Wardrobe. I not only know how to wear a corset, I've made one. And a straitjacket (Artaud's Theatre of Cruelty). I've realised how much sewing it takes to make a bodice, how much cloth to make a skirt and the petticoats beneath, and just how much mending it takes when you tread on the hem (A Doll's House). Even a twentieth century show should have not just clothes but underwear actually from the period; fabrics have changed and so have erotic tastes in breasts, bottoms, waists, shoulders and makeup. And that goes for men as well as women, as I must remember now I'm writing a novel set between the wars. And have you tried getting out of a too-low sofa wearing high heels, a 1950s roll-on, and not much else? I have, because in Albee's The American Dream they switched sofas between the last dress rehearsal and the first night. Now, which of my characters shall I do that to?
The Science Center was a great experience and it wouldn't have been near as fun if Daddy didn't go. Ellie and I were able to spent more time in certain areas while Daddy and Stuart could move along more quickly.
736 Pearl St.
It appears that the mighty Sunday paper is even less exclusive from the demise of print journalism compared to the weekly papers. When all the figures are accumulated, it appears that whilst circulation of weekday papers has fallen by an average of roughly 7%, Sunday paper circulation has fallen by more than 15%.
This was Wednesday. We were getting married Saturday. I have a picture of him from the wedding where he's lying across his brother and sister's laps, because his head hurt so much he couldn't stand up.
Some people say she was the Jordan of the 80s, but I think this is a bit insulting, as Fox doesn’t seem to be half as much of a tool as Price.
via cell phone
This year has been bizarre -- a lot of deja vu, a la 1982. First all the clothing manufacturers expect my daughter to wear the exact same styles of clothing as I did back then (and believe me, I have learned my lesson; you will not see me shelling out money for that crap again), and then Israel invades Lebanon. If I have to put up with Human League on the radio again, it will be too much. What was that bit about people not knowing history being doomed to repeat it? I wasn't paying attention....
"I've got a good sense of humor and could see being involved in a sitcom or a movie." He confesses that NBC didn't approach him about broadening his professional horizons by hosting a game show.
I was listening to a review of The Cabin in the Woods on the radio where Joss Whedon’s undoubted talents as a writer were under discussion. The point was made that, while it’s all very well to deconstruct genres and play with conventions, would it not be possible for Whedon to simply make a straightforwardly brilliant movie that operated solely in its own right and wasn’t constantly referencing or commenting on something else? Clearly someone hasn’t seen Serenity, but no matter: in many ways The Avengers is that movie. You don’t need to have seen any of the other Marvel Studios films to follow the story here (but, equally impressively, the film feels like it’s significantly moving on the story of all the main characters), and the way in which Whedon builds investment in the story and orchestrates changes of mood is impeccable. He stuffs the thing with quotable dialogue, too – Robert Downey Junior is probably the main beneficiary, as you might expect. As a director Whedon is also impressively ambitious – in the middle of the climax he finds time for a lengthy, ludicrously complex tracking shot that may well become a cliche of this kind of story in the future.
Target Audience: Paranormal fans, anyone hiding bean sidhe secrets
Felix promises that he’ll get the Princess out of the circus and she… presses his oversized head against her boobs. Felix is understandably impressed and the soundtrack croons, “something moooore. More than friends.”
It’s called “legendary rhubarb pie”, which is a curious name for a pie and I have no idea what it is about it that’s legendary. It’s very good, though.
“Principles of Islamic Jurisprudence,” M. H. Kamali, can easily be found by search on Google.
Apparently, this card was received with some severe ire. In her interpretation, the card was sent as a reminder that I was now with her husband and that I was rubbing it in. Janet believes I was being nasty. That was totally NOT my intention. My wishes were as sincere as they can get. If I wanted to get nasty, I could be really mean to her… even my dad and husband say I can be a bitch. I mean, honestly, I have pictures of her naked (to my deep dismay and disgust) but no one knows that (except for me, my husband, and anyone who may read this), not even Janet. Oh, the havoc I could wreck with those! But I haven’t and I won’t, because I am not like that. (However, I do keep them hidden, they are sort of like my nuclear weapon in case of extreme emergency. I didn’t even bring them out when she flew 6,000 miles across the pond to testify against me in the custody case when I lost my sons.)
"I know what that is. It's play-doh!" I said.
Sure enough, it pours pretty pale. It's a deep yellow with an orange tinge and a pretty good light tan head. The head and the moderately slow rise of the good carbonation seems to belie the odd clarity of this beer.
In the evening I drove Jules to Girls Club and had tea with Cindy. One of the many things I love about her is that not only does she hear what I say, but she hears what I don't say. She's one of my monkeys for sure.
If you don’t believe in what you’re writing, why should anyone else? Patience, persistence, and confidence are key components that all the great writers have in common.
30th Nov Strike Demo
The article points out that the gas can suffocate those who breathe it, cause headaches, then nausea, brain damage and death.
Merry Christmas.
Quit staring at me.
Photos Credit : Satya Sarada Kandula : All Rights Reserved
It was clear that the woman was very sentimental about chipmunks. What she wanted us to do was drive back the five miles to our property so the chipmunk could safely dismount and return to its nest.
Jen: I already watched it like, six times.
Today's new challenge at Really Reasonable Ribbon is Black and White with one accent color -- I love the look of B/W with just about any other one color! I chose Aqua Mist as my third hue.
I read something the other day that compared a spanking to sex. More specifically it was on how tears to spanking was much the same as orgasm to sex. It was well written but I will just sum it up by saying they are seemingly closely related because in both cases your partner lovingly brings you to a certain release.
Sorry there's no picture, but it's an easy-drinker that hides it's alcohol level well, so it didn't last long. Maybe next time.
Alexander Higgins is an indepedent researcher and blogger who frequently contributes to theintelhub.com. He also writes on his own site, blog.alexanderhiggins.com.
The Craft Your Days Away Team
10. To prove I can. This is probably not the best reason to hold on to, but since lots ‘o people told me that I would remain in eating disorder limbo forever, I’d like to use my stubborn side to show them who’s boss.
If Eric was neglected by the art world in the decades after his death, Tirzah was doubly so, and she remains a little-known figure. Accounts of her husband's life tend to portray her as 'the wife', faithful in spite of his infidelities, and rather dull - the sensible woman who prefered not to swim naked in the River Pant with her husband and various Bardfield visitors. For excitement (we imagine, from this reading) he ran off to the Sussex Downs with Helen Binyon, and at her side produced some of his most memorable watercolours.
The good point is that I get to add some tatting into whatever I do! Period appropriate and all that good stuff :) I'll have to make myself a choker with some of the velvet ribbon. Sigh, as if I need one more project on my growing to-do list. The madness never ends.
Key words being: for the moment.
With each exhalation, let your belly sink away from your hand and into the back body. After a gentle pause, can you feel the belly rise effortlessly when you inhale? This relaxed action cannot be rushed, so don’t force the movement in any way; an easy rhythm will settle in as your state of relaxation deepens.
- I used 1/2 cup Nestle semi-sweet morsels for the melting
I spent two months on outreach with a team in the South Pacific six years ago. We served the people, worked alongside them, played with them, traveled with them, and most of all; learned from them. While I was there, my perspective of ‘normal life’ began to change.
I would be lying if I said I am still not hurting, though. He is such an amazing guy and I know from experience how committed he is to relationships and how well he treats the woman he is with. I think what hurts a lot is knowing that all of the affection that he used to send toward me is now going to be given to her. He is treating her like a princess now and not me. Also, he takes relationships very seriously and I know he has been choosy about who he dates seriously, so I would not be surprised if this relationship ended in marriage for him.
So much so, that by the time I got to the Rochefort 10, I was tucking into bread, cheese, salamis and hot mustard, a perfect combination with these beers, and I really wasn't bothered taking any more notes, so with a fresh palate, I sampled the 10 anew the following evening.
I hadn’t noticed I was crying. I am surprised he can even see under my cloak; although I suppose that is the basic things an assassin must learn to do – to be observant. I must confess, even after a month on the run, I am still not good at spying. I can’t differentiate between a lie and the truth. I can’t distinguish who is my friend or enemy.
I guess we’ve finally found an adaptation post-Potter that’s worthy of its hype and earnings! Before I proceed, let me just tell you that I haven’t read Suzanne Collins’ books yet, nor have I read any other book in the past before I watched its big-screen counterpart. It’s my way of preserving my happiness for a film because I love it when a movie catches me off-guard. Fortunately, The Hunger Games did just that.
Another thing that I really liked about this online shop is that if you buy 5 of their W7 polishes you get a W7 top coat for free. I ordered six of them, and I got the top coat too, and I can't really wait to try it!
3 cups fat free milk
The woman, who had attempted suicide in the past, was subsequently hospitalized.
**Randomly he offers advice, "Sometimes you've just got to breave in and breave out."
Thu 17 Feb 12pm-3pm and 6pm-9pm
Kick back and relax today mates! Enjoy the day wherever you may be and take time to look back on the last few weeks of your training. Today would be a fine day to reevaluate some goals or even make some new ones…
Ben Wilson (Lib Dem) 58
Without this stercobilin, your poop would typically look grey-ish/white. Because of this, a sure sign you are having problems with bile production, such as a blocked bile duct by a gall stone or something more serious like pancreatic cancer, is if you notice your poop is this white/grey-ish color.
Whatever conclusions you reach about where you are and what your options are, self-publishing should never be seen as a way to publish your book through the adoption of a lower standard. Self-publishing is not, and should never be seen as some form of ‘watered’ down publishing. A good self-published book should be unrecognisable from a traditionally published book in quality of print and content.
He saw an angel with its palate cleft and cloven hoof for feet
Open your biscuit dough and cut each biscuit into four pieces (you may cut smaller pieces if you wish, mine were just a bit more than "bite size"). Set these on a plate, and prepare your other ingredients.
Anne Frank has inspired young writers all around the world for decades with her elegant prose, her courage and her integrity. And now Miep has gone from us too, our big sister, our protector, our witness. On the anniversary each year of the arrest by the Nazis, Miep sat at home in silence as a memorial to the group from the Annexe. "Not a day goes by that I do not grieve for them, " she wrote. And now we must grieve for Miep.
Notice what St. Paul said: whatever you do, do it for God’s glory.
Russians often tell us that they saved Europe from the Tartars (a term sometimes mistakenly used for Mongols) and they claim great credit for that feat, but the important fact remains that the Golden Horde (Mongols who occupied Russia), ruling from the Sea of Aral to the Carpathians, effectively cut off a gigantic slice of Europe from the life-giving influences of the Renaissance and turned the attention of the Russians toward the East.” Source: New York Times, 1950.
- My version of Paint Shop Pro wont load on it.
9. I know this is kind of stretching a bit, but why are pregnant women still referred to as “patients”? There’s nothing WRONG with them (usually), they’re just havin’ a baby! (On a count of three… everyone say, AWWWW.)
of white fire, words like waves
The reason I read The Hunger Games is because a friend recommended it. It’s the same reason I read most of the books I do. She knew I’d love it, and I did. I couldn’t wait to get my hands on the other two books in the trilogy.
As it took me a number of days to get the shots I was happy with any visitors to my home during the week of shooting were completely amazed by how many cakes I had in one place!
Everyone is equal,
The assault was filmed on a nearby closed-circuit television camera.
While working as a child laborer carrying and washing brick in a far away land, Felani grew up and reached marriageable age per the standards of rural poor sections of Bangladesh. She was returning home after ten years to get married. All were set up.
For those who have heard of the Gunwalker hearings (the media hasn't given them near as much air time as it should), this is probably one of the best summaries out there.
- Mini chocolate cupcakes with mango and pistachio buttercream
Then a couple of years ago, I’ve just had it, I was really feeling lower that low, I was without a job for some time, I just couldn’t find one, I was feeling lonely and getting very depressed. All the pain from the past was catching up with me.
Thanks bunches!! Enjoy your adventure in my shop!
I really like the interior of this restaurant, its a mix of bare brick and scrubbed wooden tables with a few candles twinkling away on the tables. The interior of the old mill building is not disguised, making a feature of the old industrial strength pillars and beams. The pipes from the extractor fans running from the open fronted kitchen even run through the dining room but some how they manage to not look out of place.
5. JACK JOHNSON
When I touch your books
But how's this for sneaky?
Who knows? Who cares? We shall see the evolutions on both ends and rarely meeting, unless in violent shoutdowns and teargas and eardrum shattering fireworks here in big Oakland where the culture’s litmus test continues to confront and fail the people in a certain sad kinda way. Leaving the anarchists like buzzards afterhours, tearing up the businesses and corporations without any sense or purpose, just unleashed anger and misguided childish rebellion not to be tolerated.
Atherton decided to return to her home education.
No, I did not forget to write a blog on my dad, I wrote about him on facebook and got some tears out and then smiled as I downloaded pictures of him. I miss him dearly, but as I have mentioned before, what keeps me smiling is him, knowing he would want me to keep smiling. I can't imagine how disappointed he would be if I was just sad. Yes, I'm sad, but I'm moving. I see him in dreams and I meditate on him. I can see him, his warm smile. He makes his presence known to me here and there. I actually talk to him sometimes, I know he can hear me. I'm not crazy, I just know hes there sometimes, listening.
January 6: Self Portrait.
In counting all our tears and sighs?
1/2c. applesauce
Hi dawn i have another SSO question: this is hypathetical but what if one of your childern was disabled in some way, like say one of you kids has a sight impairment. How would you balance the time specail treatment, medical bills etc with the cost of having other kids? I have 3 kids and my oldest is blind, I having such are hard time making sure that my other kids are cared for while I care for her. What would yo do?
Here's what it looked like before:
Papers : Sunday Picnic Collection by Webster's Pages, Bright Matstack by DCWV
Brewflott 1
The Social Democrats link Murati to a small Turkish party that is part of the ruling coalition.
you folded into silent night, humane
Whisk into the mixture the lime juice,
It seems like I always post about hosting dinners and cooking for groups of people. If you haven't figured out yet that I both enjoy hostessing and baking, well then, you're just not keeping up all that well. Tonight is no different than usual. Jordan and I hosted the rest of the ministers and their families for dinner today.
The current financial bailout crisis has propelled Barack Obama back into a substantial lead over John McCain– which is astonishing in view of which man and which party has had the most to do with bringing on this crisis.
For my Grand Daughter's Valentine Card. I used the Heart Shaped Sweet Treat Cups from Stampin Up and filled it with M&Ms. The White Scallop around the Heart Cup is from the Sweet Heart Stamp Set from Stampin Up. Used the Heart Punch from Stampin Up. Not sure where I got the Paper. The Sentiments are from the Clear Stamps from Studio G. I made a Red Heart Pull to get the Candy out using the Wild Card Cartridge and I used Red Ribbon.
I Do Dream You – Jennifer Gentle
Thursday, February 5, 2009 (Ski hill construction & snow dump)
I coughed up blood.
Doesn't Kaden look thrilled to be there?
One issue might be though why it is only now that the matter seems to be being investigated. Mr Anwar indicated in January 2011 that, once it became apparent that the emails had never enjoyed a trip to the sub-Continent, he wished to raise the matter with Crown Office. What action has been taken by Crown Office, if any, regarding the matter of the email evidence till now? Why has it taken so long?
Homicide detectives who find themselves in couples therapy? It’s a descent premise, but is it believable? And can it remain endearing for more than a few episodes? Well, USA Network’s newest drama, Common Law, which premiered last Friday night, leaves me undecided.
I consider this a true endorsement for TPM and Choice Theory approaches to emotional and spiritual well-being. Each of these counseling methods relies on triggered emotions to go back to false beliefs and decisions that are still affecting our lives from those trauma.
The glass bottleneck is thus becoming a bigger concern and runs the risk of cutting off a whole generation of talented middle managers who might decide to do something else or give up on promotion full stop.
When did any of you goody-two-shoes have a conversation with God who gave you the right to establish such priorities. The Pope needs to take a good hard look at his own vanity and stick to promoting a God that is just, fair and far reaching. He needs to work to end all evils; not those that make good political and partisan theater. He needs to stop ignoring child abuse in his houses of God.
Down the hillside the Turners notice the fire blazing once again and as they turn around they are confronted by Jonah Hex himself.
A day old cooked (refrigerated) rice works best for fried rice. Freshly cooked rice tends to be sticky and is difficult to fry. Chicken or any other meat can replace the shrimp, and the vegetables can be varied according to taste and availability.
Besides being the best things that have ever happened to me, they also happen to keep me in shape. Everyday, regardless of the weather, emotional breakdowns or physical ailments I walk at least three miles. Call it mother’s guilt, but I cannot go a day without getting my boy exercised.
I have to say that I thought this book was enjoyable. Mack and Madison, the hero and heroine, are both very likeable. He's more fun to read, but that's just a personal preference of mine. The erotic scenes between them are steamy, so if you're shying away from this book because you think it's typical Siren fare, don't. It's worth a look. And the introduction of the sport (or is it extreme sport) of kiteboarding is a fun change in the contemporary romance genre.
It was beautiful and sunny and warm and the wind whipped up around you every time you stepped outside. The ground was scattered with dry leaves that swirled around in jetties of wind. Profoundly (and quite accurately), my friend Katie said, "This wind makes me feel like Pocahontas." This is not appropriate February weather.
Clean finish that leaves you with a dark fruit taste
Sunday night at El Beso continued to be a favorite. Dancing at El Beso is a bit like performing in front of a crowd of professional judges. There are lots of dance instructors in attendance looking for students. It can be a little intimidating to get up and dance at the beginning of a tanda, but the flip side to that scenario is that it's about the only time there is much room to dance. There are usually more young dancers than at most traditional milongas.
Lilian G. Katz, University of Illionis at Urbana-Champaign, USA.
Hundreds of pedestrians heading through the Borough Hall area this morning on their way to work were annoyed.
She tells the story of how she came to the conclusion that ignoring her children is a good idea:
But a thief's life is stolen time
Thursday of this week is the much-talked-about Tampa City Council meeting that could determine the fate of the Cigar City Tasting Room. Letters have been written, phone calls have been made, and now it is down to the wire. It is probably safe to assume that the three who voted "no" will continue to do so even if only out of ego-driven stubbornness. It is also probably safe to assume that the three "yes" votes will hold, seeing as they are based on logic and common sense. Which leaves - once again - Charlie Miranda. Here's to hoping he makes the right decision.
Him: "Mis-looked?"
was being nosed upon
DW: And it has no religious affiliation.
- UPDATE - according to one of my eagle-eyed readers, she thinks these amazing pieces are from Pink Door Antiques in Greensboro, NC. Thanks!
Starting things off with a short post about a book I didn't hate. Not Just Party Girls is the story of three teenage girls who have their own business planning birthday parties for little kids. And the party girls are:
On rare occasions, I get to exercise my writing muscles in longer format. Most recently I came home to find this awesome sauce in the mail and plunked it down in front of my dad. We all proudly stared at my byline; my mom squeezed me extra tight. It felt good.
Sample Disclaimer:
Think outside of the box people.
Who else bakes their cornbread in an iron skillet? What else do you prefer to use an iron skillet for?
9/30 - Colorado Springs, CO - The Black Sheep (FFDP only)
But I'm writing about these pictures not to create a new wardrobe list for myself--I've actually got a shopping list for the year (or two, or three) going already, and it's doing quite fine without these additions. For the first time in a very long time (it seems), I got so excited upon seeing a celebrity-event photo. Given all the over-the-top styling I see on celebrities, models, fashion professionals, etc., it's nice to look at simplicity like this. It makes me think "propre, but not too propre."
When I first started hiking I purchased this…
With more neighbors, come more benefits-- but also more obligations! You fertilize their crops, feed their chickens and receive more experience points. I shamefully accepted two. After that the horror of my addiction became glaringly apparent and I have declined all further offers.
Or, I should say, I do. Part of it is celebrating the symbols of the harvest in a little display like this—including pumpkins, hay, dried flowers, and whatever else seems to work.
Whether you are a stylist or looking for the perfect style, HairFree is perfect for you!
Knight of Malta.
A sport of blood, of blood, of blood
Patricia
And eldestsibling, here’s a newsflash for you. You adopted your own son! Your SECOND husband adopted your own son to whom you gave birth. You relinquished your own 16 year old son, then adopted him back! His birth certificate is now sealed, and he’s living the lie other adoptees are living. Congratulations Einstein! How does that, in any way, equate you with the other people here?
Oh, oh, Marissa Tomei in a vintage dress. Love it.
credit: wikipedia
Live out 4 or more years in paralyzing fear, anger, worry,frustration, and pain… finally feel joy again… without your prayers being answered… then you will understand. Or at least try to understand. I don't think it’s understandable by our brains.
What do you focus on in your marriage? Your rights or your responsibilities? So many of us find ourselves focusing on our rights. It’s all about what we want, what we disire and expect from our spouse. Our unmet expectations is often the source of our greatest conflicts. My wife isn’t living up to what I expected of her…. my husband has let me down….so often I hear statmentst like these from couples whose marriages aren’t living up to what they each expected it would. How about you? Is your marriage living up to what you dreamed. Is it meeting all your expectations? Notice how questions like these cause us to think and spotlight our desires and not those of Jesus.
Makes 2 servings. Enjoy!
The Hat has been away 'On Retreat' as they say behind their net curtains down my way...so apologies to our correspondent Mrs Trellis of North Wales and other caring readers for his absence. Back in the days when a Penguin was merely a valued and much-thumbed book and The Hat could sit in a bar with some pleasant company, a bit of blues, a pint of porter and a Gaulloise, he popped out to the theatre to see an immensely entertaining stage play by Keith Waterhouse called 'Jeffrey Bernard Is Unwell'. The play concerns the reminiscences of Jeffrey as he sits, accidently locked into his local pub all night. Featuring Peter O'Toole at the time, it was both hilarious and moving and was also noted for the fabulous 'egg and pint' trick as a piece of stage business, (do look it up and try it yourself – but wear some waterproofs). Jeffrey was a columnist for The Spectator magazine and the title of the play comes from the habit of his employers of posting 'Jeffrey Bernard is Unwell' in the blank space where his sporadic column would have appeared had he not been too drunk or too hungover to write it.
Kiss me Sixpence none the richer
Yes. I should know those men are necessary, shouldn't it ?
No, they do not sit and read the Down syndrome posts...But one day they will and I am glad it will be there for them when the time comes...When they are older.
And next, I felt like there was a missed opportunity with the Predator Drone. It pops up late LATE in the script. But I would’ve liked to have seen it featured somewhere. I mean you have this guy who pilots predator drones. That’s got set-piece scene written all over it. I suggested a scene to Tyler of having to access the drone from some ratty old laptop when surrounded in the remote cabin (he’s stuck in a remote cabin near the midpoint) and have to use a really bad internet connection to get the drone out there to kill his assassins before they move in and kill him. Tyler’s response to that idea was about five seconds of silence, lol, so I knew where I stood with that one. I’m just going to leave the writing to him. But I would like a bigger predator drone scene.
Ray Brown – Bass
After we did our introductions I took a hold of Jessica’s hand and we headed for our soundproof booth. I had just opened the door and I heard someone yell, “Cut”! We were informed that there was a technical difficulty with the filming. We had to go back to our starting point and do the whole thing over again. Several times. It’s kind of hard to be spontaneous and sound unrehearsed on the third try.
When we went on a recent Sunday, the kids fed the horses carrots in the barn...
OK, here are some more numbers.
The AppleTV three exhibits the outcome is a separate class requires its personal jailbreak methodology and should due to this fact of the jailbreak group may even be taken individually addressed.
2) Humbled to discover that, even though I thought I knew a lot about my extended family, I have many living relatives that I've never met.
So is Brigitta’s next-door-neighbor a secret superstar? We can talk about that later. I need to go to the grocery store and read some headlines.
It was really painful to see how corrupted the system is, right down to the bottom, and how it is always about power and money. I heard stories (and I am talking about stories with facts, names, dates, not some gossip stuff…) about people presenting themselves as global peace-builders, while they are actually on the payrolls of oil companies, lobbying to provide the best way for them to get access to cheap oil. Who cares about peace and who cares about people suffering in the conflict zones… I heard accounts of international “democratic” governing bodies that keep pushing conflict-zone issues off the agenda over and over and over again in order not to compromise a profit-making business that is going on with one of the parties involved – and while presenting a saint-like empathic face in public. I saw evidence of official U.S. and EU politics deliberately working on denying and playing out not only thousands of people in the Third World countries, but actually also the international law, UN legal opinions and resolutions. And I mean intentionally seeking ways to play out UN resolutions they have voted for a few months ago.
you can see it on dee's face in the background of all the pictures.
‘The Return’ tells the story of Mr. Gold/Rumpelstiltskin’s one failed deal: that which he made with his son, who desperately wanted Rumpelstiltskin to renounce his dark power. When his son found a solution (a magic bean that can transport you to a land without magic!), Rumpelstiltskin backed out at the last minute, letting his son travel alone to a world without magic, separating them forever. In the non-magic world, Mr. Gold suspects that August Booth, the mystery visitor to Storybrooke, is his son…and that he wants to murder him for abandoning him all those years ago. Turns out neither of those suspicions is accurate: August’s true identity remains a mystery (though I still believe he could be Mr. Gold’s son–he was working with the Nun/Blue Fairy after all), and he wanted to control Mr. Gold’s magic, not destroy it. (As ambivalent as I am towards August, I have to say that I enjoy seeing Center Stage (2000) hottie Eion Bailey every week…)
c) I get to judge someone else on their conversational skills, dress, mannerisms and looks. (This was exactly the reason my friend didn’t enjoy first dates; because she didn’t like being judged. I told her that you’re judging him, and not the other way around).
Apparently there are a few unnumbered Stephanie Plums, with titles such as PLUM SPOOKY and PLUM LUCKY, and apparently they have a supernatural element. This book—a birthday present because it’s set in my old stomping grounds near Boston—is the start of a new series in which a couple of Stephanie’s unnumbered otherworldly friends harass a brand-new protagonist, uber-baker Lizzy Tucker. Also migrating from New Jersey is a highly intelligent monkey who keeps farting and giving people the finger.
I had a similar "aha" moment yesterday when I was thinking about what could I write about for St. Patrick's Day.
The post is here. When I saw them I was really excited haha. Maybe because I am quite insecure, but I always feel like I'm doing gyaru fashion wrong or whatever, I'm still learning and seeing that someone thinks my style is nice makes me really proud. I usually post on E_G because the girls on there give me good tips, but I'm always scared as hell of Gyaru Secrets. So thank you so much, this is such a big motivation for improving my style.
13. Surround yourself with people you care about.
Tragedies, too, struck blindly and you had to count everyone. Grandpa taught us more than any LCPS Teach Your Child ...! book about Florida hurricanes, Florida wars. From his stories we learned as children how to fire our astonishment at death into a bright outrage. Debbie's comments:
Paper -
My point is that your child (the language user) is doing new things with her languages (the tools), which are also new to her. Practising the use of new tools is a good thing. I, for one, had to figure out how to set up this first blog of mine, and how to post to it. It took me inordinate amounts of time and aggravation, but now I can do it – sort of, I’m still learning too. My point is that we need to focus on the user’s developing skills, not on predicaments of tools. We need to look at what we do with our languages, not at what we do not do. Like this:
It’s a brave — and confusing — new world, and the impact of the political debate on individuals and on client planning will go on and on.
So we finally got to working on it Saturday morning...when it also dawned on me that we needed to hide the cables in the wall at the same (Aaron was a little taken off guard with this realization of mine but agreed that it made sense to do it all at once rather than waiting to hide the cords, albeit with gritted teeth, since it would require us taking the tv back down off the wall). So Aaron started by laying out all the parts for the mounting kit and reviewing the directions.
We’d like to thank the Mayor for his outspoken support to make Los Angeles a more bike friendly city, to Midnight Ridazz, Geoff McFetridge, Danny Gamboa and to all the bicyclists who came out this morning to support this successful effort.
As in the previous books in this extremely entertaining series, the Salvo Montalbano is grumpy, sarcastic and sometimes just plain rude, but still manages to endear himself to the reader, with his strong morals and eagerness to do the right thing (and love of good food!). The usual supporting cast are all in evidence, from the steadfast Fazio, to the showy (and now married with a child on the way) Augello, and the bumbling, but frequently hilarious Catarella. The book is filled with the series’ trademark mouthwatering descriptions of Montalbano’s beloved local cuisine, and the Sicilian atmosphere almost leaps off the page.
And in my search for industrial style shelving units, I came across a style of industrial shelves that started, from what I could tell, with the Ace Hotel in Palm Springs.
Dear Lilly Pulitzer,
The day looms before me. Nine hours of scheduling that doesn’t include the writer. Nine hours of “this is what I do to earn my living” that takes precedent over the service that brings me balance and the writing that allows for expression. I am grateful though, harried but grateful. I have good work to do today. The opportunity to make everyone I meet feel special today looms just as large as the scheduling book. I am grateful that my personal agenda gets turned inside out by a single button so I can face what a control junkie I can be, and that the simple act of sewing a button on a pair of pants can tear me away from the best of intention. It’s all Grace. It’s all good. It all makes me laugh. We are such funny creatures! Tomorrow. Set the intention again. Eventually I’ll be back in the zone.
dry hop 14 days 2.0 Warrior leaf 15.0
Word is that there is a certain large sporting event coming up this weekend, and this would be a great alternative to the regular herb/sour cream dip. Or in addition to it. Both are so fast to prep, why should you even have to choose?
TNG’s ex girlfriend is currently dating someone else, which could be the reason he is bitter. She moved on, and if the story is true that he broke up with her than she moved on REALLY fast. So some bitterness is understandable. However, she still texts TNG. She sends him messages about how her current bf is “alright” but she just isn’t that happy, suggesting that she was happier with TNG. What I find really interesting is he talks about how bitter/angry he is with the break up, how immature she is and that he couldn’t deal with it, but he considers getting back together with her.
Ask me if I was excited.........I was excited. Here are some photos.
The reactor pressure vessel temperatures in Unit 1 remain above cold shutdown conditions. The indicated temperature at the feedwater nozzle of the reactor pressure vessel is 138 °C and at the bottom of reactor pressure vessel is 111 °C.
I feel empty, soulless, like a deep pit or an endless cavern. I got up without a sense that today was a none day. Yesterday was a none day, but I helped out at Help the Aged. The day before was a none day and I had an annoying afternoon surrounded by yound families in Starbucks. I love them. But not when I am in a sour mood. They’re like vinegar to my lemon juice…
She gripped the doorknob, studying the familiar faces through the glass: some stood near the stove to comfort Barbara while others clustered around Eunice, near the long table laden with serving bowls, platters, and pitchers needed for the noon meal. Their eyes were wide, their kapps bobbing as they discussed today’s dilemma in strident voices that came through the sturdy Dutch door. It wouldn’t be proper to get their attention with a shrill whistle between her fingers, but it just might take that.
I have also made the decision to stop trying to do it all on my own. I have hired Jack Zenert to help me build my business into something phenomenal so that the message my horses have can get out to as many people as possible. I am doing lots of research on what others are doing so that I can piggyback off their expertise.
The system is simple but effective, and the constant flow of water is perceptible both outside and inside the lavoir: a low barrier has been built into the stream, forcing water through a hole in the wall into the lavoir. On the other side of the wall, the water naturally circulates in the pool before being released back into the stream through a second, lower hole.
TITLE: We Have Your Daughter
FACT SIX: Coffee is my favourite hot beverage. No, tea is. No coffee. No, tea. I think I like coffee and tea equally.
It was perfect, our invites would resemble a story with chapters and lots of quotes from Alice, to tell the tale of our garden tea party wedding.
Hiya Everyone, Happy Sunday to you, Hope you are having a nice relaxing day :)
Steve Rogers: He was doing his job!
purposes.
2. Add tomato puree, salt, red chilli powder, garam masala, and water. Mix well and bring it to boil.
TV host: The case of the veiled teacher? They were found innocent?
◦ Tech-Fluentials are digitally savvy and travel in globally conscious circles
I believe the best advice I ever got from my own mother .. that I am relying on to get me through some of the smaller challenges of the day to day and of raising a child .. never came through actual words.
it is to travel without the perpetual Blockbuster, Target, PetSmart, Chipotle,
But oh, what the hell! Here's the lowdown of what's been going on recently. My once not so amazing kitchen is now really really out of this world. Well, at least to me, it is.
Ever feel that there are more things you want to do in a single day than you possibly have time for?
You’re a bit of a lap slide guitar genius. When and how did you make the decision to take to the lap slide method?
After a 2-year gap, ‘Door Ni Kulne’ is the much-awaited new track from promising talent and online sensation Manni Sandhu. Featuring the ever-popular voice of singer Manak-E,.
I am still in love with Once Upon A Springtime papers! That one paper pad is never ending :)
like shards of nothing
Pitcher struggled under the weight of the man on his back. The man was not large, but navigating the swamp was no easy task to begin with. As he stumbled over an exposed root, Pitcher swore dispassionately. The man on his back stirred and began to fight against Pitcher’s grip. Pitcher had bound the man’s wrists and ankles with vines. He wasn’t going anywhere, but he could make a lot of noise if not silenced.
The Western issue!
Personally I have spent the last year “overthinking” everything and this book has me respecting my intuition in a whole new way!
'No. I'm not. I'll be back at 5pm'.
Of course I refer here to theological and religious truth. How pure this truth is in any place at any given time is revealed by the moral standards of those who hold the truth and by religious practices among the churches generally. Spiritual truth (by which I mean the disclosures of the Holy Spirit to the human spirit) is always the same. The Spirit always says the same thing to whomsoever He speaks and altogether without regard to passing doctrinal emphases or theological vogues. He flashes the beauty of Christ upon the wondering heart, and the awed spirit receives it with a minimum of interference. Wesley and Watts were worlds apart in their theology, but they could and did love and sing the same hymns of pure worship and adoration. The Spirit united them to worship even though their respective views of truth separated them doctrinally.
Let me know what your view is! Should mums be allowed to terminate newborns?
Friday: Out of town
Do you ever wonder where all those glorious seconds, minutes, and hours go that recently poured through your fingers on an idle weekend or cool evening, when suddenly you’re feeling like you’re racing the clock on some crazies hurried weekday?
India Infoline, a Mumbai-based brokerage, expects restructured debt to rise to about 3.5 per cent of total outstanding loans, to Rs1,100bn-Rs2,300bn ($24bn-$50bn), in the year ending in March 2013. They are currently estimated to be 2.7 per cent of total loan assets, according to Morgan Stanley data.
You cannot control the carefree nature of the children, but you can take appropriate measures to ensure their safety. Engineered wood fiber is one such product which can make reliable playground surfacing and protect the children from any kind of injury.
Like invocations to his personal pantheon of saints, Hubbard name-checks many musical heroes in his songs — venerated blues growlers like Lightnin’ Hopkins and Otis Rush as well as classic rockers like the James Gang and Neil Young and Crazy Horse. In a song called “Count My Blessings,” he tells the story of the 1964 shooting death of Sam Cooke as if it were a biblical parable.
That with him were, what time the Love Divine
For our one-year anniversary, my husband surprised me with a ride in a hot-air balloon. We had been up once before, during the Michigan Challenge Balloonfest — a perk I received for being a columnist at the local newspaper. But our second time up, as an anniversary celebration, was special since we got to enjoy the ride for nearly two hours away from the crowds and excitement of balloonfest.
Thank you for recognizing the importance of our institutions to the economic, cultural and intellectual future of the Commonwealth.
I want to be more than just a person thriving with a desk job. But right now, I’m trying to figure out what “more” I want to be, I want to have.
When the rumble subsided, from the darkness behind him, Christopher heard the tinkling of a bell and a muffled clacking of hooves. He threw a scared glance over his shoulder, was met only by the darkness, and walked faster, ready to dive for a useless shelter among the low bushes that lined the road. A coach, it sounded like a coach.
Keep searching and keep doing your best.
Spy Ships–The US Navy Comes of Age
I grieve that I can't more clearly recall each delicious moment of the last seven years, but I can tell you that I will continue to do my very best at savoring the moments that are ahead.
Love always and forever, your Mommy
The changing broadcast landscape presents a huge opportunity for today’s media companies. Whether it’s the latest Hollywood blockbuster or dated, obscure news footage, for every piece of content there is a potential viewer waiting for it. As the global leader in Content Storage Management Front Porch Digital offers a broad range of award winning products and services that help streamline media enterprise workflow, from migrating videotape to files (SAMMA), through publishing content online (DIVApublish) and everything in-between (DIVArchive). Either on site (DIVASolutions), or uniquely, from a secure hosted cloud platform (LYNX), or any combination of the two. Find out more by talking to Front Porch Digital today.
I am not going to comment here about whether I believe Suarez to be innocent or guilty, or why I hold that opinion, but I will talk about why I believe branding Suarez a racist is incorrect, damaging and, in fact, possibly libelous.
In an interview with Nanyang Siang Pau in late March, Daim warned that “Malaysia is akin to walking the tightrope, almost half the time is spent on maintaining balance on the wire”.
In one day I wept helplessly; expressed my anger in the office and told Paul he was an idiot, rather than just getting on and doing the work as usual; pressed the accelerator when I really should have pressed the brake, then thought that really was not sensible; and had an irrational, paranoid fear reaction. I have also been acting impulsively. So now I am back on the Sweeties.
This is Proton’s biggest challenge. Jalil said the more pertinent question at this time is not if Khazanah were to sell its Proton stake to DRB-Hicom, but if Proton can just survive by being Proton.
08 Watch That Man
But I love to write even more than I love to drink a good craft beer (or play a great video game). When asked what my one, true passion is (other than my wife of course)... I always answer: "writing." Lord Byron, the 19th century poet, said it best: "If I don't write to empty my mind, I go mad." And I probably would. Not the clock tower/high powered rifle mad mind you. Writing acts as a release valve for me, and oddly enough... a different form of social lubricant that oils up the squeaky cogs of my "mad" brain.
I hope to receive more info on artist and writer Eva Vargas.
Image: Pati's Kisses - Elisabeth Bell Designs
Arthur Bryant and John May of the Met's little-known Peculiar Crimes Unit are London's longest-serving detectives. When a bomb claims Bryant's life, it ends a partnership that has lasted for over half a century.
the boys and the boys' leaders called it,
So … it’s 15 days since our momentous sixth-worst snow blizzard in recorded history. And the garbage stockpiled in hundreds of apartment buildings’ basements over Christmas and New Year is still being offloaded onto Manhattan’s streets, awaiting collection by garbage trucks turned into snow-ploughs. Although the blizzard itself was magical (to one coming from the hot-sun, blue-sky Southern African continent), the aftermath is always going to be ugly.
All I know is it ain't over until the last brick falls
I also knew that in an ideal world, I wanted a “natural” birth, although the unknowns scared me beyond belief and I really wasn’t certain I could handle it. My sister-in-law told me about a method she learned about at a chiropractic conference called “Hypnobirthing“. After doing some research on this method of birthing that claimed to be a “safer, easier, more comfortable birthing experience”, I began to feel much more relaxed and confident about the whole thing. The more I read, the less anxious I felt. I had watched a multitude of birth videos – natural births (Bradley and others), waterbirths, hypnobirths, even births with an epidural – and I was amazed at the stark contrast between the women who used Hypnobirthing and ALL other methods! Hmmm….yep….definitely want to give this a try!
My double life between music and writing enters a new phase with the selection of my story, ‘Sofia the beautiful’, for the Pangea anthology. Without the contact with traditional musicians, I couldn’t have written this story, although – equally – the technical demands of writing short fiction have improved my work as a producer and concert organiser.
If there’s ever been a movie designed to win an Oscar in today’s environment, it’s The Artist. It’s… French, which is sort of the “in” thing (See: Midnight in Paris, Hugo, and War Horse which all at least in part take place in France). It romanticizes old Hollywood, which is like sweet, sweet kitten blood for the aging Academy voters. It features a cute dog. It features a handsome French star that eliminates the language barrier by never speaking.
Do you have any suggestions or experience concerning alternative online venues for selling your artwork?
Happy Birthday big guy!
About a month ago, I was pleased and surprised and a little confused to receive a comment from Dora at Turns of Endearment informing me that I had been awarded a Versatile Blogger Award. Honestly, I should also add “suspicious” to that list of reactions. I have to be careful; I can be a sucker. Though being married to the man I’m married to has educated my, how shall I say, inner skeptic.
It was like spring time on a plate; the ravioli were very tender and moist, the greens perfectly cooked and mushrooms soft and buttery. I haven’t eaten beets very often so this presentation was a good option. The beets didn’t overwhelm and the small dice were easy to manage.
Google Drive was released yesterday, and I clicked the button on the website letting Google know I was interested in their product. I received an email late last night informing me that my Google Drive was ready. This morning, on a lark really, I went to the Google Drive website and clicked on the download link for the sync application to add to my work iMac. I downloaded the DMG fie without a problem and opened it up. I copied the Google Drive app to my Applications folder, like you are supposed to with Macintosh, and then I sat back and marveled at it. Google Drive, finally.
Receiving a thank-you note for a thoughtful gift or an act of kindness is one of life’s great joys. Writing a thank-you note should not be a chore, but rather the celebration of an emotional connection between you and the recipient.
It was an interesting experience, both emotionally and technically, as I had my first taste of a dressing room and backstage area in which to feel nervous...Thankfully, nerves only lasted about 60 seconds into my routine (which manifested as my feet shaking, something my partner could unfortunately see from where he was sitting) and then I actually rather enjoyed myself.
Friends, neighbors, church members, and especially family have all played important roles in the success and longevity of our marriage. Our son once asked me what the secret to our longevity of marriage was. I didn’t hesitate in answering, “There are no secrets between us.”
As we parted, I gave her my card. I did it partially because I’d hoped she’s keep in contact and partially because she never actually called me by name.
Dynamic European Styling
“Absolutely. I agree,” they said.
We also want to have a large garden in the spring, thus composting! I've never done it before, so we will all experience this adventure together. I've been doing a lot of research and consulting with some friends who compost and I'm ready to begin.
American Veterans for Equal Rights participated in the 2012 Worldwide LGBT Civil Rights march last Saturday, April 21. Dusty Wenk, of Bamberg, Germany, organized the march in Atlanta which ended with a rally on the steps of the Georgia State capitol. I got to make a short speech, and well, my friends, as we say here in the South, the spirit took hold and I was moved! See my presentation here.
Wilde claims, “Suffering – as curious as it may sound to you – is the means by which we exist, because it is the only means by which we become conscious of existing” (18). This statement explains why he continues to be with Bosie, despite his greed and neglect. Bosie and Wilde have a one-way relationship in which Wilde serves Bosie, which can be illustrated during Bosie’s illness:
by the living dead kid
Congrats to all! :-)
a complicated complexity of life.
We are the Body of Christ. We have Christ living within us as the life-giving Spirit. As we eat and drink Christ by the Spirit, we are being saturated with Christ. We just become one with Christ.
To start let me post this number
What’s in Rockport, Texas? My father-in-law and his wife have a beach house in Rockport. They live in Houston, but we decided to go to Rockport instead of Houston to visit them. My husband went to Rockport with his family growing up every summer. It’s a very meaningful place for him and we would like to continue a family tradition there with our own family. Our girls loved fishing on their grand-pa’s boat, a boat ride with the dogs and simply spending time with their grand-pa and C.
They go astray as soon as they are born, speaking lies.
Michael Gonzalez, D.Sc., Ph.D. (Puerto Rico)
Have you ever heard a song and known that it was exactly what you needed to hear at that moment? That happened to me yesterday. The song is called "hold fast" by Mercy Me. I don't know if it is a new song, but yesterday was the first time I have ever heard it. I felt like I should share it. I know one of the feelings I have felt so often lately is hopeless. I guess that feeling is just part of grief. But, I know that the truth is that there is always hope in God.
For all of Anna Chapman’s fame in the West and her Russian hero status at home, it seems that she gave Russia little more than a bit of humorous PR value. She did, however, manage to chip away at the “Rosa Klebb” Russian female spy image. (Rosa was the unlovable female villain in From Russia with Love.)
In an interview with Army Radio on Tuesday morning, he said that the state planned to tell the court that it wanted to delay the demolition so that it could pursue alternatives.
We usually hit Grants Pass around lunch time. (See what I mean about “well-timed breaks”?) Not only does Grants Pass offer several gas stations close to the freeway, a host of recreational opportunities (jet boats, Oregon Caves, a huge park downtown), and the only caveman statue on I-5, it also is home to Wild River Brewing.
Hey kids! Dopeman Bates here.
The discouragement and hopelessness that I experienced during Nora’s recent hospitalization is still fresh in my mind, but not as active emotions. In my sleep deprived, intensely fragile condition I found myself engaged in a full fledged meltdown. My flood of tears camouflaged with the hot water from the shower nozzle while I silently screamed at God. In my state of misery my eyes were drawn to an emergency pull cord.
If you find a girl who reads, keep her close. When you find her up at 2 AM clutching a book to her chest and weeping, make her a cup of tea and hold her. You may lose her for a couple of hours but she will always come back to you. She’ll talk as if the characters in the book are real, because for a while, they always are.
Hold me! It was frightful!
“The speed on the event has been unbelievable as we hit 90 miles per hour on the loose over blind crests and big ditches”, commented Pritchard.
And oatmeal cookies also made their entrance sometime during the week.
Speaking of scarves. That was the theme this week. I know it's not winter and no one neeeds to have a warm wooly around their neck any more - at least not here. But a scarf can be a fun accessory, too. The first is Chocolate Shake. The pattern I used is Milkshake Reversible Scarflet by Mary Keenan. I loved this pattern and will use it again. The lace repeat is super-simple and fairly easily memorised. I used a linen/cotton/wool blended yarn with some lovely big, fluffy slubs in it. The pattern is definitely kind of frothy - and the color is exactly like a chocolate milkshake.
1 stirring
Some other things have certainly developed this year that I hadn't anticipated back in January. I didn't even know about doTERRA Essential Oils until late May and yet now that is a large part of my life - affecting just about everything I do! I love developing myself as a leader in this exciting company.
There’s nothing quite like a 3-hour Italian period drama to entertain you when you’re home sick from work. Yesterday, I watched The Leopard, Luchino Visconti’s 1963 film about the decline of the Italian aristocracy in the latter half of the 19th century. Not knowing much (if anything) about this period in Italian history, a lot of the background was lost on me, but the film was still well worth watching for its amazing period style, characters, and family drama.
Have a good day all...I need to get downstairs and get busy with my room.
..like that. The steaks were removed onto a plate, covered in foil and kept warm in a preheated oven, set on the WARM setting (less than 200F). I added a teensie bit more olive oil, and added one large sliced onion. These were sauteed until light golden brown-- just a few minutes.
during that time, i walked around the store in a haze, like in the movies when everything is blurry and kind of slow motion because all i could hear was her screaming.
I have no clear idea of what you're saying here. She "feels sabotaged." Is she? Who's envious and jealous? And now someone is trying to kill her?
Until then, thanks very much for visiting & come back soon.
I have never been in favour of pen names. I would always wonder why some writers adopted pen names. For me its always my full name that is a part of my byline ( for the newspaper articles) and books, and stories that have appeared in anthologies.
The theme for The Summit this first time out is PANORAMA. Let’s link arms (and brains and hearts!) as we pause to grasp a big-picture view of youth ministry present and future.
I like the kind that has the little mound of gel you can rest your wrist on. I don’t like the kind that advertises Office Depot or the pharmaceutical industry’s latest anti-depressant. My wrist tends to get tired after a long day of clicking and dragging, and I’m not sure I can put in a full eight hours with a weary forearm.
As I’ve gotten older I have started to understand the temptations of food a little more, but not to the extremes that some people take it. I don’t know if you’ve ever listened to The Splendid Table, but that woman talks about food like a registered sex offender talks about sixteen year olds. I once had a child in my car and they heard her talking about an egg she ate in France and I had to turn off the radio because I worried that it was doing psychological damage. She once had a twenty minute conversation with someone about the impact different types of bread have had on her life. While undoubtedly important, I rarely ever reflect back on the breads in my life when I’m not already eating a piece. It’s absolutely ridiculous. The food television networks are better but I’ll still occasionally get the impression that the food is supposed to deliver some sort of higher pleasure to the person consuming it than it should. It’s usually when they strategically light the food to look good and then shoot it with a soft filter like it’s in some sex scene on an vintage soap opera that I’ll start to feel like something is amiss.
I didn’t go to Potsdam today, as I had said last night. I thought there was a guided tour through the same company that did my regular walking tour, but it turned out I had misread the brochure and those tours are on Sundays, not Saturdays. Tant pis. But I still had a good day! I did my own sort of walking tour.
So a division occurred in the crowd because of him. Some of them even wanted to arrest him, but no one laid hands on him.
The second hand's turning
After that it was Lunch. I sat with the usual crew: Catherine, Songtum, Euan, Anna and Rebecca (Jenny was in a Drama exam, Charlotte I don’t know), and we also with Laura :) Catherine was in a very funny mood ;) She had got Songtum’s badminton racket, and was hitting people with it (not hard, just lightly), and knocking Euan and Songtum’s work with it, as well as fanning people. It was, the knocking the word especially, really quite funny :) She seemed even crazier than usual. I’m starting to think she is on something ;) After Lunch me and Catherine went up to Anna’s Biology class with her, as her lesson was cancelled but she still had to sign in, so we went with her for ‘moral support’ ;) That was funny :) Then we went and joined Rebecca, Luca and Songtum in the LRC.
wishing you all a lovely day ~~
Boot up the Eee and discover that IND has managed to ghey up their wi-fi access since 2010, adding all kinds of mandatory ads and crap.
by Tom Cabeen
GOOD STUFF: Crazy action peppered with lots of comedy. Multiple plot lines, too. I thought the whole movie was going to be about the conflict in the intro. Nope, that ended. Then I thought it was going to be about the heist. But nope, that ended too. And then the movie kept going on for another hour. It’s a long story that leaves you satisfied.
got something to say?
The salad followed the standard formula: mixed greens + fruit+ cheese (tart Granny Smith apples and crumbled smoked fontina from Willamette Valley Cheese Company). The vinaigrette was a loose pistou of nettles, honey, walnut oil, balsamic and sherry vinegars, minced shallot and Dijon mustard. A crunch of salt and pepper finished the salad.
*We left our beloved Omaha, Village Green, our friends, our ward, our zoo, and Burger Star. This was one of the hardest things I have had to do. I never thought when I moved out there that I would dread the day that we would leave, but I did. And I still miss it so much that it is hard to think of it and hard to look at pictures of when we were there.
The host started playing a Christmas song on the piano, and the guy moved off. She moved in. After the song, I hugged her hello and asked what she was doing for the holidays. She said she was going to his parents' house. Oh-kay.... He walked off and I asked if she was still planning to go to Spain with the boyfriend guy and she said yes. I then asked what her relationship with this guy was. He's her ex-husband. Great. I should have known there wouldn't be a smart, single, attractive 40-something guy in Smallville who isn't the ex of a friend of mine! And needless to say, he took off without saying goodbye once he saw we're friends.
Antoine is from France. He will be 75-years-old this June. He greets every person coming in to the parking garage as if it were their birthday. To watch him in the morning is like watching a conductor at an orchestra. He smiles, he waves, he walks up the street and he walks down the street. He ushers the cars in, he bows to pedestrians. He has a twinkle in his eye that shines brighter than the hot Iowa sun and a smile that is so infectious, that he literally changes the course of people’s day. You simply cannot be dreary or sad once you have passed Antoine’s watch.
5. Baked Tortillas Chips. Cut into quarters. Spray with oil and sprinkle with salt. Bake at 400 F for 10 minutes, or until barely browned.
So today’s showdown is between two GLUTEN FREE granolas! Udi’s gluten free granola and KIND gluten free granola. I’ve been on a gluten free kick as I have been trying to get fit for bikini season #beachbod2012, and I stumbled upon Udi’s in the gluten free aisle of the grocery store. It’s lightly sweetened with raisins tossed throughout it. One serving of 1/4 c. is 130 calories & I love to eat it like cereal with just almond milk making sure to measure my portion. It’s yummy and not too hard crunchy that it’s cutting up my gums & for its taste alone is worth the $4.50 price tag! Now one day I was at another grocery store looking for Udi’s and they didn’t have it! But, I did spot KIND’s gluten free granola which came in a variety of flavors. I bought the cinnamon version which was a tad cheaper than Udi’s brand. The first thing I noticed was that the serving size was bigger, 1/3 c., for the same amount of calories, 130 cal.. But the taste was non comparable! It was too hard and crunchy in my opinion & has these annoying little seeds that’s sink to the bottom of my cup, they almost look like sesame seeds or poppy seeds. It wasn’t nasty but, taste wise and texture wise I preferred the Udi’s. So now I’m torn between the price. I am not rich so if I can find a good health product for cheap I’m all over it. So if you want a more affordable gluten free granola I’d reccomend KIND, it comes in a variety of flavors and is tasty, but for me I choose…
Yep, that's my week.
The Albany Patch reported the Occupy response:
6 desk
The victim was taken by ambulance to an area hospital while Ochi was taken to the Alachua County jail.
I've had a pretty quite past couple of days, though I thought it was supposed to be me feeling exhausted 24/7 and just in a total daze.
Organic Acids
This is way too funny and will have readers full of giggles with both the text and with the illustrations and of course the title will provide many giggles alone! A great tale about being too concerned about looking perfect!
Or Divin is a pale yellow gold with shimmer.
More Moto hate here:
Do whatever it takes to prevent a child’s access to the property. You can:
Yes, they had beer and they were old timers we pulled up a stump and were offered beers and we drank and listened to the storys the Greybeards had to tell. They talked of gigging frogs and Yvette asked if it hurt the frogs.
“Ain’t that stealing?” Clay said.
True to the national character, the Communist Party continues to behave in the usual inscrutable fashion. Even so here seems to be a new willingness to face some of the ‘errors’ of the past, though I not sure how this could be done without destroying the remaining credibility that still attaches to Mao, whose moon-like face still stares impassively over Tiananmen Square.
I think Hamilton needs more leash-free parks, but fenced in to protect against unwanted encounters of the threatening, biting kind. Hill Street park off Dundurn Street South seems to be working fine, and will hopefully serve as a model for more parks in neighbourhoods in Hamilton.
If you have baggage and your heart and soul is tired from carrying the burden, take those steps to lighten your load. It is possible to change your life by changing your perspective, by turning your negative thoughts into positive ones. This does not mean that you will never have a difficult moment or a negative thought, but when you do this consistently you will find that it is easier to rebound from difficult circumstance in your life. I have released a lot of painful experiences that have occurred in my life, and while I still have ongoing challenges, I know that I am not going to carry the baggage.
That sustains, survives and faces the waters’ route.
___ cover quotes without names appended to them? I have to assume you called your own book “a work of dark genius”.
This past Saturday I attended an excellent workshop by Dennis J. Smith on social media. There are new ways to self promote on the Internet every day, it seems. And since I've jumped into the eBook world with my entire cyber body and soul, with quite a bit of success, I've been following other writers' journeys and thinking about the whole "How to sell? What should I be doing to become a best seller? Do I HAVE to do every social network? Do I need to go to every conference? Do I--" You know the drill.Then there's the whole "this person did nothing and sold millions" and "this person did everything and sold tons" and then "I'm driving myself crazy trying to do everything and selling nothing."
Just off the bat, I think I read somewhere that he may be working on another book. I hope so, because I'll be buying that one as well.
Wyler
* Modules appearing in the moddir path which are NOT to be loaded,
Greetings to you and the Committee! It is with great pleasure we submit the enclosed
In light of this finding, the Board declined to consider the "ornamental" isse.
I love this question! I would have to say Kitty from X-men because how cool would it be to walk through walls?!?! :)
while searching for words
“I am convinced that a committee with a supreme authority – an ethics committee – could rule on some cases, and make sure justice is done. They should have the power after games, in exceptional circumstances, to make a decision above the referee. Then the system would be perfect.
The kufta and the rice are very, very easy to make but man, do they taste good. The process of almost frying the rice in butter before cooking it in the water makes this taste like no rice I've ever had. It cooks up beautifully. I added some yellow coloring just for kicks but it does not impact the taste at all. The picky eater in the house, my husband, agrees with me in that this is seriously good stuff so I suppose I'll be making it again.
Wounded Knee by The Milkshakes
I was a broken mess, crushed, exhausted, afraid, and sinful. I’ve learned that rebellion, acting out-
“Good soldiers of Jesus Christ have many battles to fight with their unbelief, with the perverseness of their nature, with evil temper, and with besetting sins.” QOC
You better knock it off soon
Why Do You Read Books?
To say reality broke down for me right then would have been a monumental understatement, my Camaro was not some rusted piece of junk sitting on cinderblocks it was still an operational and street worthy automobile. It had only two real problems, one being the paint job, which was extremely faded and scratched up, and the other was the ceiling headliner, which was in the process of coming unglued and falling down. The engine itself, the most important part still purred like the day I bought the car.
Simeon, or Simon, appears to have been a cousin of the Lord. His father was thought to be a brother of Joseph and his mother a sister of Mary. He was probably one of those “brethren of the Lord” who were there in the Upper Room on Pentecost. He was chosen to be the second Bishop of Jerusalem when his brother James was martyred. The Christian community in Jerusalem had been warned of the coming destruction of the city by the Romans. When the uprising began, Simeon led the small community to safety in a town across the Jordan. They returned to the ruins, where they made a number of converts among the Jews. Eventually, the city itself was leveled and Simeon was sought out as a Jew and a Christian. Simeon, about 120 years old, died by crucifixion after being tortured. http://www.americancatholic.org/features/saints/saint.aspx?id=1877
The Constitution provides for constitution of additional courts and Articles 128 and 224(1) allows for expansion of the existing strength of the higher judiciary. If litigation explosion is a concern, Justice Pal questions why Legislature did not take recourse to these constitutional measures which have an inbuilt advantage of judicial ‘independence’. Furthermore, Justice Pal views the presence of technical members as meaningless for ‘improving the quality of adjudication’, because the courts are free to seek expert opinion when necessary. She adds, “To have technical members (meaning officers of the Executive) on a Tribunal is as repugnant to the independence of the judiciary as, for example, having the Secretary of the Ministry of Finance sitting on a Bench of the Supreme Court or High Court to decide income-tax matters”. Moreover, contrary to its objective, tribunal increase the burden on the courts as their decisions amenable to the jurisdiction of High Courts and the Supreme Court. Viewed from this perspective, it appears that the Executive intends to circumscribe the role of the judiciary.
This is what I got done today, had Blanche from Saturated Canary printed out but hadn't got a chance to color her yet! If you want her you can get her here: http://www.etsy.com/listing/95852878/blanche
3/29: Reading: Mittell, “Narrative Complexity in Contemporary American Television” (online)
I am being blamed by my daughter because I left her father 6 years earlier!! (again, not the Officer! He is and always will be the love of my life). I am the bad person because I sold the house she grew up in.
So, I decided to do a digi layout for the Little Scraps of Heaven weekly challenge. I am very new to digital and I was not sure if I could pick up one of my files to use on the layout, but I figured it out right away! Woo Hoo!! Here is what I made...
I'm not sure what possessed me to get this old shaft
My favorite posts over there are:
The Ferber Method isn't for everyone. Some parents have strong philosophical objections to it and some babies don't respond to it. Moreover, we're going to have to re-Ferberize Alex every time something funky happens to his sleep schedule, but that's a small price to pay compared to what we were facing. As far as we're concerned, the good Dr. Ferber is a real American hero.
Empire is a gorgeous color addition to the family but sadly it is limited edition. Dragon is permanent. If you're looking for a pigmented pink with subtle gold shimmers, look no further. Below is a shot with Empire in the bright sunlight so you can see the shimmers better.
Here's what should worry Romney: he has 88% name recognition. With the voters who have an opinion about him, positive or negative, his lead expands a little bit to 34-17. Perry, however, has only 60% name recognition. And with those voters who are familiar with him he actually leads Romney 29-23. That suggests Perry could overtake Romney if he gets into the race and achieves parity in name recognition- voters who know both prefer Perry.
I have written extensively about the “two-storey universe.” In short, this is a description of how many modern Christians see the world. There is the first floor – the natural world which operates according to naturalist, “secular” rules, and the second floor – the world of God, heaven, hell, angels, etc. The spiritual crisis of modern man is the inherent disconnect in these two worlds. It is a belief construct whose history goes back some centuries yielding a deformed Christianity and a rising tide of unbelief. As I have written elsewhere, many Christians have serious doubts about whether there actually is second floor.
How did the word love
Until its found its guiding light,
Makes 10 servings.
There is one BIG BUT: my assumption is that guidelines are “just” recommendations based on exhaustive and objective reviews of existing evidence. No more, no less. This means that the clinician must have the freedom to deviate from the recommendations, based on his own expertise and/or the situation and/or the patient’s preferences. The more, when the evidence on which these strong recommendations are based is ‘scant’. Sackett already warned for the possible hijacking of EBM by purchasers and managers (and may I add health insurances and governmental agencies) to cut the costs of health care and to impose “rules”.
The moment the proletariat is able to pass these socialist laws is pivotal under Marxism, as it signals the ascendance of the proletariat to the ruling class. When the proletariat becomes the ruling class, the socialist revolution begins.
We appear to have been caught up with the drama, our days now cycle through a series of fairly predictable lurches from tragedy to triumph and back again.
One thing I am sure of - when you intend to publish a book on the E-platform, you need to get the very best editors money can buy. Here at Authors Electric, we’re trying to put together our own resource file of trusted editors and proof readers to help our readers find the right person. There are a lot of editorial services offered out there on the internet or in the Writers and Artists Yearbook. Choose carefully - go by recommendation if possible - use professional sites and professionally accredited copy editors and structural editors. Don’t give the Spam Reviewers a typo to stand on!
Serve with some good for you salad leaves. Enjoy
But the problem is much more pervasive than Wall Street and Washington. They're the easy targets because we are reminded of their greed and stupidity on a daily basis. Gene Williams, a 57-year-old bond trader, nailed it as he joked that he was "one of the bad guys" but that he empathized with the demonstrators. "They have a point in a lot of ways," he said. "The fact of the matter is, there is a schism between the rich and the poor and it's getting wider."
Although you are not suppose to keep opening the hive and disturbing the bees to check on how things are going, we decided on Day 4 it was time to do this anyways. There were a handful of bees fighting the ants off at the entrance but no one was going in and out like the other hive. It was a rainy day on Day 3 so we thought maybe they all just stay in and this is the reason for little activity. Day 4 arrived, I suited up, traveled out to the hive, opened it up ….
I cut a fresh zucchini into french fry shapes, sprinkled them with a seasoning mix intended for poultry (onion, garlic, salt, pepper, blah blah blah) and wrapped individual servings into aluminum foil. At first, I placed those on the grill over the open fire pit.
Don't forget....there's a 40% sale on everything at the store until the end of the month in honor of Mr. Sweet 'n Sassy's birthday! Now's a good time to add this set, or others on your wish list, to your collection!
I'm looking forward to make pizza on the grill again.
As I have previously shared, I am not a real lover of flying, which is another totally interesting thing, because in my teens and early twenties, I thought it would be fun to be a flight attendant. Ha!! A flight attendant that gets motion sickness and is afraid of flying!! Good thing I never pursued that career path, huh?
In my English world I have questionable teeth. But, I’m getting them fixed. I’m on the waiting list for the Dentist and it’ll only be like 5 more years until I get in. But its free. Score.
search the cargo area. The narrow beam swings across
other tongues is indescribable. It unlocks and unleashed the eternal deposit of
I don’t see my self,
The sale figures are in for Two Irish Lads and Nor All Thy Tears, and while I can’t retire in luxury they are quite gratifying indeed. Thanks you to all those who bought and read them. If you would like to learn more about any of my books, or to order copies, click on the specific cover below. Two Irish Lads and Nor All Thy Tears are available in both Kindle and Nook formats. Publisher’s price, $4.95.
09. Calling
This will stop new turbines from being built, and, over time, cause all of the existing ones to shut down. Second, we allow the free market to replace the electricity obtained by wind energy with power produced by burning cheap natural gas. Third, we hire 17,500 unemployed veterans at $100,000/year each, and put them to work as snipers to kill the 400,000 birds (including 70 golden eagles) that are now hacked to death by wind turbines each year. Voila, the same results as wind power, and a savings of $1.75 billion/year for the taxpayers. Clearly, the devotion to wind power is not due to the fact that it's a lucrative investment. It's a Western fallacy that is the fiscal equivalent of selling your home to buy a much less efficient one for twice the price. And beyond being economically wasteful, global events have proven this fallacy to actually be deadly.
I am not blogging because this week has sucked.
“Lord Jesus Christ, through your victory over sin and death you have overcome all the powers of darkness. Help me to draw near to you and to trust in your life-giving word. Fill me with your Holy Spirit and strengthen my faith in your promises and my hope in the power of your resurrection.”
4It would not be hard for me to say such things if your souls were in my soul’s place; joining words together against you, and shaking my head at you:
Please pray that Christians in India will find strength in Christ to bear the persecution and to continue to proclaim the Kingdom.
VBAC= vaginal birth after ceasarean. I'll be honest with you, I had been dreading the whole birthing process during my first pregnancy. Absolutely positively dreading it. I could not imagine pushing a person out of my vagina. I worried about the pain, about the aftermath, about pooping in front of strangers (goodbye, my one or two male readers. I'll be back later with a funny/non-vaginal post). I feared having a big flappy crotch, to tell the truth. And after seeing the size of Charlie's head, I realized that my fears were all very legit.
So when my 5am alarm doesn't go off, my body is active vs. sedentary and my mind is focused on things other than organizational design and development, my ingrained habits start eroding and the question of 'do I REALLY need to get up ' surfaces.
The key to capturing good photographs really depends upon knowing when NOT to depend upon a programmed mode, essentially when NOT to trust standard metering, and when to shift the program mode to a higher shutter speed or different depth-of-field setting (either directly or through Shutter and Aperture programs). Thus, it is essential to understand the benefits different f/stops and shutter speeds and how they affect the photographic product. It is my hope that this mini-tutorial will help you start to take advantage of the power in your camera.
However, one PAP grassroots leaders debunked the rumors and told us that Mr Desmond Choo is likely to be fielded again:
When people ask about my ‘process’, mostly I want to ask what they mean. Does an office worker have a process? A plumber? A painter?
Helen, oblivious to my leering, wanders into her kitchen and decides to look at her developed slides once more. She drags everything into the living room, draws the shades, then sets up the projector. One picture in particular draws her attention, an image Helen snapped of herself in a reflected window. She improves the focus of the picture to enhance the reflection, and realizes that she captured an image of Candyman in the photograph.
one of my many, many, unnecessary mistakes.
And yes, I find the fact that the story is about Jack the Ripper quite ironic, thank you very much.
Using my empathy, I focused on trying to pick up on the emotions of any lucid person around, hoping I would hone in on Jessica’s emotions. Normally, the waking feelings of others hit me like a gale force wind, without my even trying. In fact, it had always felt like a bit of a curse that I was a walking sponge for other people’s pain. But right now, all I felt
When we got to the last pub, we were all untied and prior to that I had a few pints and began feelng the effects of it all. After much stumbling I managed to run outside and swiftly threw it all back up on the side of the street. I felt that at this point it would be best if I had gone back to the halls and call it a night.
Toni at A Bowl Full of Lemons has a 21 Days to Get Organized Challenge. I love it because she focuses on one room at a time, which is how I have to do things. I’m starting in the laundry room. Doesn’t Toni’s look great?
See IMPORTANT lineage notes below*
You ask me for a contribution
The line was quiet except for the cries of the boy's mother. Later in the day. The mother went into the boy's room because she wanted to remember him. She thought she would start by looking at his clothes. So she opened the closet. She was face to face with piles and piles and piles of unopened CDs. She was surprised to find all those CDs and she picked one up and sat down on the bed and she started to open one.
“It’s … well … you see….” He breaks off, considers, stares into the distance. He could be a character in a Beckett play. For that matter, so could I. I keep quiet, inwardly cursing my stupid urge to make small talk. I thought it would cheer him up. But it’s really more like the Chinese drop torture. For both of us.
· November 16, 2011 8:00 PM
~Steve Dotto, host of Dotto Tech
Jobs lived and died a particular kind of relation between the individual and the organization, between creativity and corporate departmentalism. It is one of the strongest stories in the book. It is fascinating to wonder whether Jobs’s career – perhaps our own too? – can be considered as repetitions, with some modifications, of one really quite simple idea or position. Whether we love or hate Jobs and his products we cannot deny he found a formula that has made Apple the world’s most valuable commercial company.
so I was so excited to do something different
Her patterns are very detailed. Laurie will send out an e-mail and have each of us RSVP whether we are taking the class.
OK, so we started the day by running the Get in Gear 5K. We took the train to Minnehaha Park, met up with my cousin Julia and ran the entire race in the rain. It sounds horrible but it was actually quite fun - definitely a great memory-maker. It was nice to catch up with Julia and spend time with my husband - and we ran 3.1 miles to boot! Everyone did great and despite being totally soaked I think I can safely say the everyone felt great too - at least after we reached the finish line.
An arranged call to Auntie W brought some relief and comfort thankfully. Middleson suggested that maybe pancakes (Auntie W's recipe) would cheer him up just a little. More hugs and pancakes-a-plenty.
because in the quiet camaraderie of our afterglow
What sort of voice do I have to offer?
But then (were I you
He enfolded me in an embrace that took away all of the pain and anguish. Every bad decision I had ever made was wiped away. I was a new person, a stronger person. With time and His help, I would be able to move forward from my old “friends” and live a life that was worthwhile. I clung to Him, never wanting to let go. I could imagine the smile that He gave as He whispered in my ear, “I will hold you for the rest of eternity.”
WARNING: SPOILERS!!!
In many situations I believe I would fall in the category of the pragmatist who weighs the actual importance of the principal against the perceived outcome and decides the most the super market manager (who probably couldn’t care less about one broken egg) could give is a replacement egg, a hollow apology and a forced smile. And why would one waste the gas money for that?
AK: Of the three, Susan Sontag was most drawn to the forbidden. She left a marriage and young child to spend a season in Paris with her lover, Harriet. In Paris, she wasn’t afraid of her homosexuality. The other women were breaking other barriers: Jacqueline Bouvier felt she had permission, in France, to explore the life of the mind. In Birmingham, Alabama, Angela Davis and her sister pretended to be from Martinique so they could be served at the front of the shoe store. For an African American girl In Jim Crow Alabama, the most basic public space was forbidden, and France — both the imaginary France and the real place — was a way out.
2. When potterish donkeys begin muttering beneath their breath, it's time for the more horticulturally minded mule to find a pair of pruners and start working in Mum's garden. I called it my quiet red mule 'side-step.'
Ring Guy – Well, I don’t remember hardly anything about Ring Guy. Frankly, all I can remember is I wore his class ring on a necklace and we used to hang out in the attic of his parent’s house where I’d listen to him play the guitar for hours. I continued to party at CCPE’s house after the breakup (bad idea), and in hindsight, I probably just dated Ring Guy because I wanted to make CCPE jealous. I can remember that ring like it was yesterday – it was massive. It looked like I had some kind of weird growth on my chest when I wore it beneath a high-collared shirt. Very attractive. I can’t even tell you why/when that relationship ended, but I don’t have the ring anymore, so it must have. Unless Ring Guy is out there pining for me somewhere and I never adequately ended things …
Jai Kiran Bedi!
Note the following taken from the Human Rights Campaign website:
over medium heat in a small frying pan heat the oil
Participants: Tim Lawrence (chair) Mark Fisher, Jeremy Gilbert, Dave Hesmondhalgh, Timothy Taylor
I would do it for the novelty, to earn frequent flyer incentives, or for research (an article or curiosity).
“Mommy, I want to do a race.”
Wow! It’s been forever since I have written a post. Probably because nothing really exciting has been going on in our lives – just lots of work.
take 1/3 of the meringue and fold into egg yolk-flour batter. do this quickly until a thinner mixture is obtained. This bit of egg white is “sacrificed” for a more homogenised mixture which allows the subsequent meringue additions to be folded in more smoothly
Add the cookies to the bowl of a food processor and pulse into fine crumbs. Combine melted butter and cookie crumbs in a small bowl, and stir with a fork to mix well. Press mixture into the bottom and 1-inch up the sides of a 9-inch springform pan.
4. It would take a modern spaceship 70,000 years to get to the nearest star to earth.
As you can see, there are no tables and chairs (not any more!) but there are small standing tables that will accomodate a few bottles, glasses or small dishes:
He told the Cincinnati Enquirer: ‘The only way I felt anyone would pay attention would be an article in a respected journal by a respected cardiologist.’
I have also been in Doubt. That’s a sad place to go and I try not to visit there too often.
Served with: Bourbon County Stout – Goose Island (Chicago, IL)
“Foxes not only prey on native animals, but increase the spread of invasive weeds by dispersing weed seeds through their droppings and it is imperative that we reduce their impact,” he said.
Driving Down Memory Lane
Instructions: Make card from smooth white cardstock. Cut a whirlpool cardstock block slightly smaller, round the upper corner and adhere to the front. Diecut the two grass layers from patterned paper, and adhere to the bottom of the card. Stamp the sentiment to the bottom of the card, and finish with a stamped heart. Diecut the rainbow layers from patterned paper, adhere to the right side of the card and trim off the excess. Diecut the heart from patterned paper, and adhere to the bottom of the rainbow. Stamp the cloud & heart to white cardstock, cut-out, adhere and color in the heart. Stamp the castle to patterned papers, cut-out, layer together and adhere. Stamp the unicorn to cardstock & patterned paper, cut-out and layer together. Color in the hooves & horn, cover in glitter and adhere to the card front. Color in the windows and door handles on the castle with a black pen, then stamp a heart on the doors. Add jewels to the rainbow to finish.
Ink: Tuxedo Black (Memento)
Liverpool rested most of their big boys against the Cottagers. The Reds have a hot date with Chelsea in the FA Cup final on Saturday.
monday we to UIC to do surveys and share our faith on campus. it was really cool to be back on campus and talking to people- it made me miss Buenos Aires summer project! our students really took the initiative and had some great gospel- centered conversations. yesterday we went to east garfield to visit breakthrough ministries (http://www.breakthrough.org/) and then to lawndale to visit lawndale community church (http://www.lawndalechurch.org/). we read "real hope in chicago" by wayne gordon before we got to project and it's his story of the history of lawndale church. wayne is a white guy who moved into an entirely african american community and has been working there over 30 years. they have an amazing ministry including a health center. they are currently building a 20 million dollar building to house their expanding ministry. it was really cool to see that change is possible and that it's being done well. check out www.ccda.org for more information on how to effectually transform at-risk and under-resourced communities.
In 1975, after a disastrous ’74 campaign, Erskine “Erk” Russell, Georgia’s Defensive Coordinator, realized he needed a way to motivate his players. Thus was born the idea of the Junkyard Dawgs.
Kate’s face went wide with horror and her mouth got all wiggly-looking like when you see heat escape a radiator. It didn’t matter. I didn’t care about this bitch no more.
Things get especially tough when Aidan talks about him. He doesn't understand. He still includes Charlie in his everyday talks. When we leave the house he says goodbye to Charlie. When we give Flippy a treat he wants to give one to Charlie, too. He thinks Charlie will be coming back. It's hard for him to understand that his constant companion is gone forever.
Fuaireadar bás ar son
This jumper provides lots of entertainment for my two kiddos. It allows me to do a few things around the house, too! I'm very grateful to Santa for this awesome gift he left for the twins.
The current standings are shown below:
Tautness
I've been exploring the idea of rituals and traditions myself lately. Not so much in an unschooling context, but in a personal context. And just as I'm wondering how to answer those yearnings of my soul for more recognition and celebration of the wonders and joys in my life, Andy comes to me with the same yearning. Now I find myself learning about Winter Solstice traditions which, I'm sure, will lead us to explore other rituals and traditions in that same swirly way all our conversations around here lead into each other. We discussed why we've continued to observe some Christmas rituals, even tho I walked away from Christianity 8+ years ago, after a heartfelt practice of 17 years as a true believer. Andy has never considered himself to be a Christian, and leans much more towards Buddhist concepts.
While the statistical proof of Liverpool's wonkiness comes as no surprise, the top tacklers table may not meet popular perceptions. The two most successful tacklers in the league this season were players who have been widely acclaimed for their artistry but less so for their industry: so it is time to pile more praise on Yohan Cabaye (116 tackles) and Moussa Dembélé (113). The much-vaunted Scott Parker was not far behind them in terms of tackles and both he and Cabaye made exactly the same number of interceptions
Patrons grabbing at grub, pigs in sties,
In this economy, spending your advertising dollars always involves wise and strategic decisions. Visibility is critical and doing it the right way is important. When assessing where you want value and where you want the visibility, you have to consider the newest sports franchise in the Triangle, the Raleigh RoughRiders.
Next we took samples of wort, samples of beer from the storage tank, and unfiltered beer. The beer was given nutrient broth media and all of them were incubated for a few days. The idea here is to see if anything unwanted grows in any of these samples.
Things I like about it;
-romance novels (suspense or military history are more my style)
to follow a trace he has created, leading along a lot of splendid spots, ending at..........
You’re supposed to be bringing a nice quality wine with you and you want to wrap it up in a brown paper bag? What are you, a wino? A good wine deserves a bit more respect than a brown bag, especially since that bag won’t keep the bottle chilled or protected. And hey, don’t even think about using your beer cooler. If you don’t have one, then buy a small insulated bag that you can keep tuck under the table while you eat.
This parallel novel is complete at 56,000 words. For more information on the novel, please see its Web page at (redacted)
Cloak of Wind and Beacom Quest
With Halloween bеіng а 5 billion dollar industry, it іѕ nоt hard tо imagine that уоu maу be аt a party whеre ѕоmеone еlsе haѕ thе ѕame costume аѕ you. Stand out frоm thе crowd by accessorizing wіth the rіght shoes, jewelry, makeup or props. Try tо uѕе authentic details suсh аs a real stethoscope with your nurse's costume, оr somе fuzzy handcuffs wіth уour cop costume and уou will nоt only leave уоur compethtion іn thе dust, but you will hаve ѕome great conversation ice breakers. Also pay attention to thе smaller details suсh as а French manicure and pedicure tо gо аlong wіth your French maid outfit and feather duster. Choosing thе wrong accessories (such as а pair оf 80's style Vans Slip-ons іnѕtеad of sоme sexy heels) can cаuse а major hit to your sexy rating.)
-Release pressure after 1hour if using for dishes which require crumbling or else release after 2 hours for the paneer cubed pieces so that it doesn't break.(Cut into cubes and refrigerate for further use.)
It was deleted. Here was my post:
The Culture Centre’s cladding consists of nearly 30,000 triangular-shaped honeycomb panels in XXL size. This extraordinary size could only be achieved using wide-coil aluminium, 2,000 mm in width. The pearlescent, high-gloss, EuraMica finish gives the building a crisp, fresh exterior. At night, especially, the light reflection makes the Culture Centre a mystifying landmark.
It’s the summer before senior year and the alluring Angel is ready to have fun. She’s not like her best friend, Inggy, who has a steady boyfriend, good grades, and college plans. Angel isn’t sure what she wants to do yet, but she has confidence and experience beyond her years. Still, her summer doesn’t start out as planned. Her good friend Joey doesn’t want to fool around anymore, he wants to be her boyfriend, while Angel doesn’t want to be tied down. As Joey pulls away, and Inggy tours colleges, Angel finds herself spending more time with Inggy’s boyfriend, Cork. With its cast of vivid and memorable characters, this tale from the Jersey shore is sure to make some waves.
Not that goods are ever displayed in shops as ‘très resistant’ or ‘bien maquisard’ or that male fashion papers ever give the man in the street any tips on the subject. Adam, which is a sort of male Vogue, continues to live in a world of its own, inhabited by enormous blond men with steely blue eyes and the shoulders of a gorilla, bronzed by a lamp, scented with Aroma 3 and dressed in dainty smokings of midnight blue, belonging to Clubs such as Magdalen College or Rules and wearing whatever old school tie happens to tone with their complexion. But the Frenchman is above all a realist: since he knows well he can never be a blond gorilla with eyes of steel he makes no especial effort to look like one; instead, he prefers to give the impression that he has just blown up a railway bridge. Lovely stuff! This is street style. The fashion media didn't even acknowledge it. Sorry, I'll shut up again:
The Doctor: I see. That's a very interesting concept.
I didn't do much to these photos since I like the originals, though I did play around with a couple of new actions (to me) to brighten them up a bit (one less lonely girl - fearless). Please click on the photos for a slightly enlarged view. :-)
Though the night around me be falling,
technology expertise to the table on WCS platform and will be responsible for supporting
Good sellers are always looking for the next challenge and that usually means changing employer. Investing in them will make them stay longer and you will make more money by having them here.
Or..... there is a Democrat trying to pretend to be El Presidente for Life or summat. What with the Court not mattering, and that he has decided that he can do the Legislature's job by Executive fiat and regulation. And you gotta demonize the opposition and make it personal, ala Alinsky. Oh, poor SPLC, they are such a shadow of their former selves.
In 1941, when the East Africa Campaign ended, Wingate was relieved of command, and the Gideon Force was broken up. With time on his hands, Wingate complained loudly that requests for decorations for his men had been ignored, and that they had failed to receive back pay. He also wrote letters to members of government complaining that the Ethiopians under Hale Selassie should have been granted the independence that they had fought for against the Italians. His list of political enemies among the British grew longer by the day.
However, one disadvantage comes from his lack of court experience. As with the Bonds Grand Jury, Sheridan’s questions were often imprecise and vague. Frequently the questions, especially when asked of his political or media opponents, were barely disguised polemic, perhaps designed to appeal to the jury. In addition, I imagine that, in conjunction with his remaining legal advisers, Mr Sheridan had decided by this stage not to give evidence himself. Therefore some of his questions would, either deliberately or sub-consciously, been designed to get his “evidence” across to the jury, although he would have been aware that the judge would direct the jury that his questions did not amount to testimony.
Watching the slow procession through,
David, who had killed so many for (seemingly) so much less, essentially lets this one go, leaving it to his son to do the dirty work of finally dispatching Joab (1 Kings 2:5-6, 29).
Part 2 takes on all the myths and misconceptions about food, health and weight loss. Read why calorie counting is not always necessary, why exercise is key and how to know which supplements, if any, you need to take. Is dairy really as healthy as the ads make it out to be (the short answer is NO) and what’s the deal with soy? Is it safe or not? Are raw diets really healthier? Learn how to read nutrition labels, master the supermarket aisles and when it’s best to buy organic.
You are not alone (breathe in)
Fashionistas, for one, “suck.”
The Advantages of Fireplace Log Racks
In my life I have been known to rant. About social injustice, stupidity, bad manners. Sometimes as a result of my colleagues, often as a result of reading the paper. I don’t hold a grudge, but I do get it out. But occasionally I am inspired to do more.
Sending you all my love today.
Quaint would be overstating things, but it has an appeal as it peels and sags, rusts and leaks…….. and part of it at least, reaches for the sky.
If I was the brand owner of Carlsberg Special or Tennent’s Super, what I would be tempted to do is to keep the existing product at 9.0%, but introduce a new brand at 7.5% which would sell for considerably less, and let the market decide which prospered and which failed. Yet there’s no evidence of that at all. It will be interesting to see what happens over the next few months.
So the one day is done. And I have to be in touch with her again. But for what reason? What else do we have to talk about? You? I was even hesitant to switch back because I thought I should leave you guys alone. My friends tell me that even with the right intentions, things can turn out wrong. If I don’t answer her because I don’t want to be a cause for any misunderstanding, people may think that I’m a snob, or bitter for that matter. If I answer her because I want to be a friend, people may think that I’m trying to fit in or maybe trying to ruin your relationship. It’s hard to be an ex placed between your past and his present when there is no place for an ex in the first place.
Musical Beat Hidden Bang-up 2(B2) in basement.
Ok, that last paragraph went on a big time tangent.
This recipe is one that I have used for years. It is so yummy, decadent and comforting. It may make a small pan but you can definitely double it up. This is the best to eat alone or cut in pieces, served warm with some Breyers Vanilla Bean ice cream and Hot Fudge! The perfect dessert and my favorite may I add.
I have been very busy lately with other stuff. So I didnt had time to make a
But I did take one important photo. The World Trade Center originally opened in 1973, when I was 10 years old. I remember very clearly watching it rise. Well at about the exact time I took this photo, 2 pm on April 30th 2012, Tower 1 once again became the tallest building in New York City. I added a little red arrow. There it is.
Kreisleriana, op.16
Now stupidly I used the term “half breed” which means someone who is a mix of ethnicities, I then laughed at the stupidity of the situation.
Between the centuries XII and XIV, Genova was one of the most powerful Repubbliche Marinare (Maritime Republics). Considering its important role in the Mediterranean Sea, it is not surprising to find culinary similarities with remote areas such as Sicily. Trenette for example – the name comes from “trena” that in Genoese means stringa (shoelace) – derive from the Sicilian Tria, a particular type of pasta often combined with chickpeas.
1934-36 Batter-Up #137 Stan Hack
The name Pukey goes all the way back to his first day at school. Splat! The first school lunch he ever had; hot dog, potato shoe strings, peas, and peaches.
Sometimes I will flip my sketchbook upside-down and make random marks. Then I flip the pad back upright and figure out what images I can develop the lines into. For this one, the lines resembled a large, scrawled letter M. I imagined two persons: the side profile of the first person with their lower leg, torso, and head on the line leading upwards (on the left-side of the page); when the line travelled down and towards the middle of the paper, I thought I could have two torsos pressed-up beside each other; with the line going back up (on the right-side of the page) I would build up the full front of the second person’s torso, shoulders, and head.
1 reaches
DATE CITY VENUE ON SALE DATE
After that the President, Abraham Lincoln, called for 75,000 volunteers to invade the seven Southern states and force them by arms into submission themselves. He also ordered a naval blockade, even though the navy was not then strong enough to enforce it.
dunes
An activist, entrepreneur and self described 'project architect,' Ritchey explains what he does as,"designing vehicles and platforms for people to work on things together in a different model than what has come before."
So Mr. Landlord came over and together we figured it out, or so we thought. Shortly after he left, I realize it was not fixed after all. Now, I don't like to be a problem renter, so I have not called him about it again. At least the clothes smell clean. But sheets are a huge mess -- they just spin tighter and tighter until I could use them for a rope. And since I have no hot water pressure to the washer, it is kind of bugging me that my dirty underwear and towels are just spinning around with cold water and germs.
I can't wait to hear his talk here at UHV. Though many give poets the back of their hand, this man's work and advocacy are important, especially in today's ideologue-dominated world.
The story unfolds from the point of view of these sets of characters, each of them high quality ingredients to this bubbly, explosive mix of a cocktail.
they'll all be gone
Simon Nicol, Fairport's front man, said at the time that he'd been thinking about it but the point was lost on him.
Tanner: I don't know. But it is really cool. The car is clear back there.
Basically, as I like to tell her almost everyday, I saved her life. I was like a superhero, mask and all.
Because honestly, mid-nineteenth century London normally looks like a wet fart – stinky, soggy, and brown.
I called the realtor and asked her why. She starts yelling me at me telling me "I seem to forget who owns the home." I yell back you seem to forget I am not living there for free I have paid my rent, and have a right to privacy under California law. I ask her how she would like someone she has an adversarial relationship entering her home when she is not there. Admittedly she did not like it. In the end she had no explanation for the inspection. It served no purpose the deal was done. This was plain and simple harassment and coercion. In the end she told me to call Angela the landlord..Fail!
then men...I think its hilarious!"
Diane Alberts has crafted a wonderful angel love story--and not the type of angel story that you'd generally think of first! Her wonderfully flawed characters will pull at your heartstrings and capture your imagination. Rebecca and Tony have this crazy-awesome relationship that begins pretty much with this: R-"Hey, I'm an angel and I'm here to save your soul." T-"F* off, crazy lady." Makings of a great relationship, right?! The pages fly by as you fall in love with Miranda (Tony's daughter), watch her melt Rebecca's heart, and witness Tony falling in love for the first time since Miranda's mom left him. I adored the way that their romance developed throughout their time together. It was touching to see how each could make be influential in essentially thawing the heart of the other because both of them had some immense hurt in their past. It's a great, quick read that will have you waiting for more from Diane Alberts.
Programs that offer ongoing support help ensure that key employees take advantage of all the benefits that a S.O.L.A.R. insurance arrangement offers, while also helping to prevent any unintended outcomes. Ongoing support may be especially valuable as employees begin planning their retirement income distributions or manage policy loans. It’s also helpful for doing customized retirement income analysis, automating the distribution process and monitoring those distributions annually.
into the cupboards she went and out she came with the electric juicer we had when we were kids: the proctor silex "jucit", baby.
There were multiple passes, a header, and the ball bounced off the top of the goalpost. “Oh, my God, go!” a dad shouted.
No doubt, Casey remains the most famous saddle bronc rider in rodeo history. The measure of his fame is a bigger-than-life bronze statue of him riding Necktie. It stands outside of the ProRodeo Hall of Fame and cowboy museum in Colorado Springs, Colo.
But you got problems oh-oh-oh-oh
And just to prove I was there (and I haven't photoshopped myself in here) - me in front of the bookshop in my wedding outfit (and holding Han's handbag I promise).
Extendable leg rest
I'd like to blame it on our modern world where we are barraged with information delivered in quick spurts and sound bytes. I believe my brain has been re-wired to scan quickly and move on...even when I think I'm being deliberately slow!
It's hard to get my work done when I'm distracted by my dry heaving.
Find the Joy in the Journey…sometimes it comes in the least expected ways, even in a plate of gummy bears!
Earlier this month, a senior executive of state-controlled nuclear engineering group Ansaldo Nucleare was shot in the leg, with an Italian rebel group claiming responsibility for the attack.
'The Dutch parliamentarian Geert Wilders, the author of a controversial film on Islam, stated on Friday that he has filed a complaint at a London court after the British authorities denied him entry into the country in February.
Each time I watch “It’s a Wonderful Life,” I begin to cry at this scene. It provides an early glimpse at the truly good heart of George Bailey: as a boy, he offers compassion to his employer who is mistreating him at the moment. I’m getting choked up as I type this, just thinking about it.
Their motto's are described always in relation to the denunciation of class. "We the people". Or, "Power to the people".
Until, he accidentally vaporize his Pre-Algebra Teacher, Mrs. Doods! He needed to defend himself against Mrs. Doods who was attacking him while transforming from a regular teacher to a monster! Thank goodness his Latin teacher, Mr. Brunner throw him a pen, that when uncapped became a three-foot long bronze sword that vaporized her!
no worries – the cheesecake was made with ingredients we are allowed to eat and it’s one of her favourites, so it was a win win.
I participated in the Make a Splash challenge over at Crafting in the Rain and this months material was leather. See what everyone else made here. Want to sign up too? Click on the button to learn more:
On the way to running him in, I lost my brakes on my truck and ran a 3 way stop.
Inti (the most brilliant person I know. actually.) commented this after reading the post:
It is easiest to have 3 stations set up: bamboo leaves, rice, and fillings. Have the twice hooked on to something nearby. Folding the bamboo leaves is one of the trickiest parts of wrapping zongzi. Hence the video will come in handy. First pick two leaves that are complimentary. If you fine a long skinny one, look for a short wide one. If you find one that is a little tattered, look for a big sturdy one. The slick part of the leaves should be on the inside facing you. This is the part that will be touching the rice. The outside of the leaves are a little fuzzy and not glossy. Hold the leaves so the base of the leaf is towards the outside and the tips are overlapping. They should also be slightly off-center (back one a little lower than the other) to increase the width of the leaves. Bigger width allows you to make bigger zongzis. Fold the ends downwards as if you're making a cone. Fold over the end of the cone so that there is a crease. Without a crease, rice will escape and your zongzi will turn into a dirty rice water soup. The crease should be tight as the zongzi will expand when cooking. Also the ends of the leaves need to be long to ensure that they cover over the rice when wrapping.
“The photo words?”
By proclaim I mean “to make apparent and/or known”, and Christians ought to do so without subtlety or craftiness. We say with St. Paul: “BE RECONCILED TO GOD!” We make things known by our actions and by our words. If I’m wearing basketball shorts, walking toward the park with a basketball under my arm, I’m making it known that I’m going to play basketball. Actions speak. Likewise, speaking is acting. Talking is an activity. Everything we do speaks and everything we speak is an action. So it is with our whole life that we proclaim the Gospel because the Gospel informs every facet of our lives. The Gospel tells us who we are, tells us how to act, and tell us what to say with our words and with our deeds.
Until one day I drove home past a shop that had a great sign with "CLOSING DOWN"in the window.
Otherwise, Coach Petrino may find himself between a hard place and a roll. And that ended so well last time.
Event Schedule:
oh, and Yeah i've gotten shitfaced drunk and high before.
So now to my question of the day. When I published my own AOY rankings earlier, I was asked if I took into account that distance runners don’t compete as often as other athletes – and my response was that I had. After all, we’re talking a race of 3 to 6 miles, which seems to me can be done more than say once a month or every other month. High school athletes run the two mile (or equivalent) weekly. Collegiate cross country runners compete every couple of weeks over three to six miles depending on gender.
I went back to bed and broke down into shaking sobs. I curled into Special One's arms and our grey kitty started showing me the love by kneading my arm. I laid there for about 20 minutes sobbing.
The unemployment rate is 4.9% for people with a BA degree. How much does Romney think it will vary according to the presidential election outcome? Or, put another way: “Unemployed? It could be your president.”
The Peace.
As my godson showed me one of his gifts after the ceremony, I asked “Do you know what this stands for?” Glancing down at the cross with a dove in the center, ”Yes, peace.” he said. ”Oh and love. It stands for peace and love”.
Yesterday was Coastal Clean-up Day. Volunteers along the Panhandle turned out to pick up trash on our beaches. This little shore bird wants to extend its thanks for everyone who helped make our environment just a little bit better and our beaches just a little more beautiful.
Okay, so maybe he wasn’t outside in a field, but here is this man with a BABY handing out scantrons. THIS IS MY LIFE. I think my mouth was open when he handed me the scantron.
Out of the fullness of the heart, his mouth spoke.
Fortunately, finals are over now and I seem to have survived them all. Maybe I really will keep my 4.0!!
i started my day with a visit to becky and jorge's beautiful 20-acre ranch. becky and i have been friends since about 1974 when we were in junior high school. they have goats, horses, dogs and a cat, and huge amazing oak trees. good times!
I kept looking at Goodreads where everyone wrote such long posts..is it just me that can't write anything long about a novella? Honestly I find it so hard, it's like my mind wants to make it shorter just cos it is a short story.
- I'm going to move out and live in Newcastle for most of 5 years
3) Most don't know the extent of Soros's evil deeds because most of the exposes of his filthy crimes are on the inner-webs. And there's NOTHING bad about him on the Network News or in Newspapers. (Or on MSNBC and CNN).
The Accused - More Fun Than An Open Casket Funeral (Combat 1987)
John and I treated ourselves to a morning date at our local cafe this morning (it's a new month baby!) - and I must say, they were packed, so economically speaking, the restaurant chain has not gone under without us. But we banked a serious amount of cash and are definitely reaping the benefits of it.
7.Nuts &seeds-raw pumpkin seeds,almond,cashew
It’s very important that we take a moment here because what I have just done, I believe, has never been done before, comedically speaking. It is the comedic equivalent of a quadruple axle in figure skating. I have just played a hand known now and forever more as…THE TRIPLE ENTENDRE. Have you ever heard of one? Me thinks not. Yes, indeed, the triple entendre is alive and well. The triple entendre not only says oodles about the limitless talent of its creator, but it also says something about the reader. Think about it, the name – SWEET DODO – can be read, rightly, in any of these three separate ways.
By walking one makes the road,
"this stud bumped into me, beef there was 'fin to be, my appetite for destruction is finicky..."
Another MK veteran, Ramatuku Maphutha, then declared that soldiers would be mobilised to march on Helen Zille's office: "They are always ready. It's either she vacates the office, or cooperates. We are prepared to sleep there if need be until we get an impressive response… We can render the Western Cape ungovernable within 24 hours."
Socialising
Allah (SWT) says:
It is now 2 p.m. He has drowned, and neither authority has yet responded.
Back to the brush pile.
I think it'll be fun. A great chance to learn. To write. To share. As you know from the silence around this blog during a good part of the summer, now is prime writing time for me. My best chance to get some momentum before the high season returns. I'm definitely hoping to share a few conversations here along the way. And don't worry, there's no pressure. You'll be the first critic of the finished product, long before it hits the Ice Cream Diaries or the aforementioned book. And if it's not to your liking, we scrap it and forget it ever happened. Worst case, you got a free sundae out of the deal.
I have borrowed a camera and have taken some photos of the latest bits I have been working on ....
Photo from unexplainablecrystals.com
WINGS is a very well written book, however I felt like WINGS was a very slow moving. I wish that I was given more of an insight into what Laurel was learning about. Laurel was a little dry and naive, which made me not connect with her very well. I was able to connect with David, which was strange since he was not the main character.
Elephants thrive only when they are free among family and community, integral members of the vast floral and faunal communities with whom they have evolved. As renowned elephant healer and founder of Elephant Aid International (EAI) Carol Buckley asserts, sanctuary is still captivity. But in contrast to zoos, sanctuary allows elephants to be elephants in a way they want, in an environment as close to their native habitat as one can make in North America. Notably, sanctuaries only exist to care for those who have been broken in spirit and body from the brutality of the captive trade.
To Make the Dark Chocolate Cream:
I'm just saying that I am sick of being looked down on or excluded or whatever because my body isn't smaller. I'm not lazy. I'm not unhealthy and anyone would be envious of my amazingly low cholesterol level. My size just so happens to be in the double digits. Sue me.
His mind had dulled over the course of time and therefore it didn’t actually occur to him that he had just eaten a fresh piece of fruit. There was no one else to point out the oddity of his discovery that morning of a single, ripe banana laid caringly at the side of his bed. Nor was there anyone to warn him of the danger that came from eating that unusual find, plucked from a tree not present in the city he was living in – according to Gareth – alone.
We also have a special thank you pressy for all the played along so be sure to check back!
Cardinal - Cardinal - 1994
This was my first time attempting clouds. Sorry the photo isn't great--looks way, way better in real life. I was pleased with how they turned out. They give your image so much more depth and dimension!!
And for those of you wondering, Loser Ninja made me pink heart shaped pancakes before I went to work today, and is planning to make me a steak dinner while we watch The Princess Bride.
However, you can probably also see how there is a core group of food items that make up your primary diet, right? What we want to do is get it to where foods with low glycemic index is part of that core. Once we get that to become routine through habit, we'll leave it alone and you're all set.
The other day, Rep. Joe Walsh (R-IL) took to the Washington Times to explicitly say what many on the right are thinking -- no to a two-state solution. Israel should annex the West Bank outright. Recognizing that this would force Israel to choose between being a full democracy or a Jewish state, Walsh elects for the latter, and reduces Palestinians to only a limited degree of political rights. It is equally obvious to the rest of us that this is unsustainable, and while Walsh is already sacrificing Israel's democratic character, he'd likely end up sacrificing its Jewish nature as well. Either way, it's the end of the Zionist dream of a Jewish, democratic homeland in Israel.
Tina you are an amazing woman. Thank you from the bottom of heart for sharing this chapter of your lives with me.
pkgrm: ERROR: preremove script did not complete successfully
Mrs. B is extending the giveaway for the bat and pumpkin cupcake necklace I made giveaway until the 1st of November so if you still want a chance you can hop on over there and add your name to the bunch.
While singing a verse from the evening hymn
Meditation music played during the entire rub down.
Now, if only he hadn't misplaced them he could have worn them to school today. I have a feeling I'll find them somewhere really interesting when I clean up in a bit.
It’s never been easy for a woman to face getting older, but it definitely doesn’t help when you suspect that the pharmaceutical industry is trying to take you out before your time. Okay, that’s probably overstating it, but not by much.
“Shake hands with me,” the other boy said. Nikolas grasped his hand. “Hi,” he said, grinning cheekily. “I’m Leonard Astor, but you can call me Lenny.”
This was the indulgent part, after the music and camping at Cambridge in late July. I was persuaded by friends and family who were probably very fed up of me wearily dragging my problems about, and looking grey, to go abroad on a sunny package holiday. I did it! And it was just what I needed.
In a large bowl, whisk the flour and herb/spice mixture together. Gently rinse each blossom, pat dry, then cut off stems. Remove and discard the interior reproductive structures (either threads or stumps) that were attached to the stem. Discard. Fill a small bowl with club soda. Drop each blossom in, one at a time, carefully agitating the blossom to encourage it to open with the help of the club soda. Remove and shake excess club soda off. Drop blossom in flour mixture, tossing to coat, then hold blossom by stem end to lightly swish the flower end into the mixture as if a broom. Shake off excess flour mixture. The blossom should not be fully covered. Place prepared blossoms on a paper towel.
To protect their dogs from the harsh Peruvian winter temperatures ranging in the mid-60s Fahrenheit, the would wrap their pets in sweaters. Here be proof…
The full colour map was originally going to be a fabulous double-page spread in the first UK edition of the book. But in the end it had to be turned sideways and reproduced on the inside front cover to conform to the more traditional paperback format preferred by the main UK booksellers. The Muse still thinks it looks fabulous, and younger readers with sharp eyes should have no trouble counting every single hoof print, though older ones like Katherine might need a magnifying glass to see all the details.
Are you a member of a group (MOPS, Jr. League, National Meat Cutters Assoc.) that would be open to having me speak about my trips to Iraq, what PLC is doing, and how they can be involved? Although I wouldn't pass a hat or anything like that, fundraising, awareness, and increased involvement would be my major goals.
Cigarroa’s lone goal came in the opening 20 minutes, on a corner kick that was eventually deposited by Victor Gomez.
I'm amazed that it's mostly sold as a houseplant. I left a few pots of them out in my garden during the winter, and was surprised to find them living and thriving after all those freezes we had. I wouldn't have thought the ones planted in the ground would have survived the prolonged cold. It seems, though, as long as they receive plenty of shade and rich moist soil, they are happy.
Bake the brownies until the top is dull and a knife inserted into the center comes out clean, usually about 40 minutes. Transfer the pan to a rack and cool the brownies to room temperature.
four
I will be discussing the UFO phenomena in detail at the conference in Cheyenne, starting this Friday and continuing on Saturday. There will be a live audio feed – see the brochure below – so if you want to listen you will be able too. I will also be taping two shows for the DAY STAR television network, so it’s going to be a couple of very busy days. Thanks to Charlene, Barry and Julie for taking the initiative to hold the conference.
This entry will be a very short one.
They (there are two of them) will work with my x-box (old school), Wii, and my Mac book. (they also work for the PS2 and gamecube)
Please send me an e-mail if you have any questions about the kits!
The size is important, the syllables, and numbers, numbers.
Fabric: Family is the fabric of life. Your marriage is the start of your family. Make of it what you will.
The fact was, an assistant coach was seen in the shower with a young boy. The situation demanded more than a mere mention of it to his superior. Yes, legally, that is all that Paterno had to do. But it should not be overlooked that Paterno was, without a doubt, the most powerful person on the Penn State campus.
They had make a marble run together!
The massive barrier breakers of the world,
The coordinating force in question is, of course, Islam itself. Given the religious totalitarianism intrinsic to it and the imperative it contains to expand the geographical domain of that totalitarianism, it is hardly surprising that Muslims in a non-Muslim society should pursue Islamization, and that they should pursue it in a variety of ways given the broad spectrum of personalities, backgrounds, skills, and social standings they will be drawn from. There is no reason why Muslims cannot reference the actions of other Muslims they have never been in contact with in attempting to convince Europeans to meet their demands. Indeed, they will be extremely likely to do so, as these actions can comprise the single most obvious dilemma facing said Europeans with respect to their Muslim populations.
I would have loved to write my journalling in a spiral, but my pages always have a tendency of morphing themselves, not leaving much space for journalling at all. So I had to put it at the back again. Here it:
Post card from Franz I received with this.
The point is, when it comes to chores, I do them, but I'm damn lazy sometimes. You can't do that with a baby around. You can't be lazy about these things. And you can't feed a baby onion rings.
Well, we're scared, but we ain't shakin'
I tought we should have a girly one this time.
Mr Mugabe used what, on the face of it, was sold to the world as a power-sharing agreement to consolidate his own one-party state.
Def: Know what I mean? Or, literally, You see what I want to say?
The debate is well worth viewing in its entirety but if you are only interested in hearing Robin's comments then click forward to 12.11 and 25.08 and 30.36 minutes.
"We could not stand by idle and see a major work by one of America's greatest sculptors be allowed to turn to dust," Green-Wood President Richard Moylan told the Daily News.
I shall continue to update that page with our communications, for now.
In this movie, he is nothing but Austin Powers with goodlooks. He talks as if his enemy is "Master man" and he thinks that he can recruit army from dollar menu from Africa. Might have worked for Borat to get actors from Romania for a dollar. But Captain America ...
TODAY FROM AMERICA:
One could tell he was always “on” by his eyes. The only words I can muster are ”Christopher, I cared more about you than anyone I’ve never loved in person, and I’ll miss you.”
In a large stainless steel saucepan, combine carrots, apples, pineapple with juice, lemon juice, cinnamon, nutmeg, and cloves. Bring to a boil over high heat, stirring frequently. Reduce heat, cover and boil gently for 20 minutes, stirring occasionally.
I take her to a real room, through a door, off the supply area, and suggest this is where she may sleep. We enter and there is a decent bed, two dressers, a small closet, a nightstand and lamp, a clothes hamper, and a waste paper basket. We are underground, I tell her though I am sure she suspects. You may freely use the lights, though I prefer to use red lights at night. I show her how the switch is set to facilitate this. I let her know that the whole place is rigged similarly. “Security", she asks? "Or are the red lights tactical or something?”. Ah, no, though technically they preserve night vision. Really, it is just because it was fun to do. It is sort of neat. She chuckles. Do you want an alarm clock, I ask? She has one, so we move on to the other door in this room. Inside is a bathroom, with a bath, separate shower, and all the facilities she should need. I ask what toiletries she might require, including of the feminine varietal. She peels off a list, and I note them on my pad. As we leave these two rooms, I begin looking through the supplies. I find most of what she wishes, a clean extra set of bedding, a few extra blankets, and a teddy bear for her. I hand them over and suggest she stock these where she feels best. When she returns, I go on.
Let’s put this in context. Here we have most Scientologists scraping and scrimping to get every possible bit of money to the Church. Some people have taken out second or third mortgages. Some have raided their retirement savings, or their inheritances. They’ve gone without that vacation or that new car to contribute every penny they can.
God sends the rain and the sun on the good and the bad alike.
We're going to see Ben Folds tonight (Jerry, too). So we're all looking forward to that. Classes are going well. I have to write a resume (due next week) which is a bit of a challenge since my paying jobs in the last 14 years have been few and far between (and extremely part-time). I'll just have to spin the volunteer stuff I've done into work skills.
Let me ask one last question, which has apparently never occurred to the so-called journalists at the AP. Whatever David Crosby’s talent as a musician may be, his drug use is legendary. Back in the 1980s, I often talked to friends who said they did not expect him to live much longer. Fortunately, he has beaten the odds, and I’m happy for him that he has. But it seems very possible to me that he may pass on a genetic predisposion to addiction to his children, or even more likely, that the drugs he has taken through the years have caused him to pass other abnormalities to these kids? Can he be held legally responsible for damage he may have done to children he isn’t even raising?
Prepare us for a world of righteousness
And now......this tiny little school will have a new student in the fall. My little Frog is going back to Building School!
The character of Noel Pascoe in my novel The Double Shadow was based on the knowledge I had of my two grandfathers, both of whom fought at Passchendaele in the first world war. One was seen to have had a good war, the other a bad war. Any soldier who has fought in Afghanistan will tell you that there is no such thing as a good war.
“We have confidence in our judiciary,” she added.
At any time of the year this is a wonderful place for wildlife photography. This I think is the Common Darter.
And a special code for Dad-
17. Austra “Beat and The Pulse”
We are sorry to share with all the MyWorld Tuesday and Skywatch Friday participants news of the passing our friend and fellow blogger Klaus Peter. Klaus was an active participant, supporter, and eventually owner/maintainer of Skywatch and the founder of That's My World. He loved nature, photography, and sharing his knowledge and beautiful images with us all. We can't begin to say how much we will miss him.
Written by Otis Rush & Produced by Willie Dixon
Where was I? Oh yes, in the same newspaper there was an article (16.10.10, p. 21) saying that "Mum Barbara Soper beat odds of 50 million to one when her new baby was the third to be born on a date where all three numbers were the same". Baby Chloe arrived on 08.08.08, brother Cameron came on 09.09.09 and little Cearra Nicole arrived on 10.10.10. Barbara, of Rockford, Michigan is not, thank goodness, aiming to produce another child on 11.11.11.
A few years ago (about November of 2007–to be exact), I was “shot” like a pinball out of a pinball machine shute. What happened?
Will Holman admits, ‘My unconventional resume has proven to be a liability in a competitive job market; architecture firms I’ve interviewed at are looking for people with traditional commercial experience and advanced software skills. … This situation is of my own making, and I don’t regret any of the steps I’ve taken — forward, sideways or backwards — but I do wish there was more allowance in the licensure process for unconventional paths like mine.’
As you progress in your line of strategy, mark off each step and examine to see if you are on track with the desired outcomes. If something is not working figure out the best way to make it work or come up with a new plan that will work better. Be flexible but also have discipline.
Silver: Bismarck Altbier, Dry Dock Brewing Co., Aurora, CO
The banks know their power, too. American Bob Diamond, who took over Barclays in 2011, let it be known that he’d consider moving the bank’s highly profitable investment banking arm from Britain to New York if it became, as he saw it, over-regulated or over-taxed. And he’s by no means the only banker making veiled threats behind the scenes.
I used to to walk into a book store and immediately judge it by the selection of blank journals (no a fair judge of character I realize) now I do less of that because I have begun to really enjoy two journal brands. Moleskine and Field Notes Brand. I have a nice variety of moleskine and for a while I was into the whole gtd thing, and got a nice soft cover pocket notebook squared from moleskine, I love the grid and the paper but it was two big to keep in my pocket. It felt like the George wallet. Then I saw online fieldnotes were giving a free three pack away with any order, like the cheapo I am I ordered pencils, about $4 I got a mixed pack of the brown notebooks and started using the squared one for frequently used math equations. The ruled one is getting used for recording coffee roasting times and beers and wines I have tried. The blank one is not getting used, I don’t know if I like it, the blank white paper looks strange to me.
Tonka Beans
And you're right that regardless of one's sexual orientation, all people were created by God with supreme dignity, which means nobody should ever be unjustly discriminated against. I'm with you there.
The power base of the darkness that resides in the controlled matrix around this planet is becoming corroded and weakened as billions upon billions of nasty demons and ghouls have been taken out in etheric spirit worlds. Vast armies of light led by spiritual warriors,gods,goddesses,angels,animals and a few humans..have forced the dark forces into retreat.
I was the first to leave Kentucky between Amanda and I. She stayed almost a week longer than I did. My flight home was early like before. Amanda took me to the Lexington airport early in the morning and we said our goodbyes at the sidewalk. It was so hard to leave Kentucky. The people I'd met there were so wonderful, especially my four buddies. When I got home I called Nathan to let him know I'd made it safely, as he had asked. I put him on speaker phone so my family could hear him talk to me. They laughed as he asked about the trip and if I was safe, if I stopped to take breaks while driving, etc. It was so fun and I missed them already.
So onto my project for this week:
of her hand,
A great steak from aged grass-fed beef can’t be beat. It doesn’t need a rub
Sassafras – In Love
His high ASVAB scores give him free choice of pretty much any job he wants, quite a few with hefty sign-on bonuses, so he's quite excited. He passed his physical today, so he will be sworn in on Monday.
At the moment I am shaking my fist at the TV, it's advertising Aqua Lite shampoo from Pantene. I am often weighed down by my heavy heavy hair. Household chores are almost impossible and having a job type job totally out of the question. Clearly I need to skip down to Bootsesesss The Chemistssss to get me some of that Aqua Lite.
Here's a link to an online forum with a series of posts nominating different psychedelic-era records as the inspiration for each Dukes of Stratosphear song. My thinking is that the song that "25 O'Clock" most resembles is "I Had Too Much to Dream Last Night," by the Electric Prunes. The people who posted to this forum agreed with that, but also nominated a few other songs (some of which I've never heard of).
And, of course, have fun.
Its just ashame i am left with the messy bowls filled with ganash and strawberry sauce....but hang on....Bowl of melted choc plus moi froufrou... yum yum yum......
The world of UnLondon is populated by astonishing frights and delights that will thrill the imagination.
17-Sinner's Prayer
